
Part 2. Chapter 32 to Chapter 60.

Livia Horn had died and returned to life, enduring her first trial. She had even managed to provoke and stay close to a man who wouldn’t hesitate to kill her.

Though she hated to admit it, he had shown interest in her, going so far as to commit despicable acts….

Livia took a deep breath. Instead of refreshing air, she felt cold seawater fill her insides and then recede.

Was it due to the witch’s power or the blessing of the gods? It was still fascinating that she could breathe underwater and move freely without buoyancy.

But that wasn’t what mattered right now. She had tried to harm him with the golden dagger given by the witch and even with shark teeth, but it was all in vain. She needed to try something else.

What should she do first? As she pondered this, Livia looked around. The hidden city of Atlantis lay beneath the sea—the domain of the sea god. Finding help here was difficult.

In that case….

“Ha ha! Afraid of the wolf? There’s nothing to be scared of, Livi.”

“No matter how fierce the wolf that invades, as long as we know the wolf’s habits, we can prepare for it.”

“So, Livi, the most important thing is ‘knowing.’ Got it?”

Her father’s words were right. She needed to know first. So….

Resolute, Livia looked up at the sky. Then she leaped powerfully toward the top of the golden castle.



The sea was vast, and the path to land was treacherous. Moreover, Atlantis was submerged deep underwater to avoid human detection.

Sometimes, on good days, it would rise close to the surface, but today was not one of those days. Livia swam diligently to the surface but couldn’t decide which direction to take to reach her destination.

Squeak, squeak!

Just then, something nudged her feet. Startled, she looked down to see a cute dolphin circling around her.

The dolphin, with a white belly and harmonious gray and black stripes, had a beautiful and sophisticated yellow pattern near its tail.

‘Hello, dolphin. You’re really pretty.’

Although the sound couldn’t be heard, she mouthed the words. Amazingly, the dolphin seemed to understand her, stretching its mouth into a smile. It seemed like a friendly creature.

She was momentarily tempted to ask the dolphin for directions to her hometown, Harvest, but shook her head, dismissing it as a ridiculous idea.

Even though she had seen many mystical creatures around Triton, there was no way this dolphin, appearing in the middle of the sea, could be one too.

…Or could it?

The dolphin circled around Livia once more and then pushed its back against her.

Livia stared at the dolphin’s sleek back with a puzzled expression. Was it inviting her to ride? As if it were sensing her curious gaze, the dolphin tapped her thigh with the tip of its tail.

…Really?

Despite her doubts, Livia climbed onto the dolphin’s back, thinking it might be possible. As soon as she settled behind its sharp dorsal fin, the dolphin began to move forward at an incredible speed.



The speed was so intense that she felt she might slip off unless she clung to the dolphin like a barnacle. She wanted to scream, but her voice wouldn’t come out.

Holding her breath and clinging to the dolphin’s back, seawater splashed against her face. The speed was such that the splashing water felt quite painful.

Where on earth was this dolphin taking her? She wanted to find out, but she didn’t dare open her eyes as they darted between the sea and sky.

After about an hour, the dolphin gradually slowed down and eventually stopped. As Livia slowly raised her head with a bewildered look, her eyes widened in surprise.

A cliff abruptly cut off as if scooped out with a spoon, an endless trench, and fishermen’s boats scattered along the coast.

The scenery was all too familiar.

Even the ship visible in the distance had been crafted by her brother, Iason.

As she squinted to narrow her vision, she spotted a shameless face laughing freely on the deck.

He had dark brown curly hair, freckles spread wide across his shoulders, and eyes that seemed gentle at first glance but were always watchful.

…Phedum.

Livia’s eyes, already narrowed in anger, burned red. She couldn’t comprehend how the person responsible for annihilating her entire family could laugh and converse so casually.

What was justice, and what was goodness?

The innocent had perished, turned to ash without even a proper burial, while the guilty had buried the past and were now laughing and enjoying themselves.

How could he be laughing on Iason’s ship, how!

Thinking of Phedum and Maya, who had exploited her family under the guise of an engagement, made her insides burn as if she had swallowed fire.

An engagement? Ha! Could that even be called an engagement? No, it was nothing but plunder.

Phedum and Maya were outsiders who had settled on the outskirts of the village five or six years ago. At that time, there was a teacher named Grocke who taught the children simple numbers and letters, and it was there that Livia met Phedum.

“You’re actually an orphan, right? So you came from outside too, didn’t you?”

The boy who grabbed Livia’s hand as if he were glad to meet her was Phedum.

“I’m not an orphan.”

“You were originally an orphan. So you’re an orphan. Your current family isn’t your real family, right?”

Ignoring Livia’s displeasure, Phedum followed her around. When Iason saw Livia’s disgust, he would occasionally beat Phedum, but after that, Phedum changed his approach.

“Livia and Phedum kissed in the alley!”

“They say it doesn’t matter because they’re going to get married?”

“Are they engaged?”

“Livia said it’s not true….”

“Is she dumping Phedum? What a promiscuous girl!”

Such words circulated from the mouths of children barely twelve years old. Initially, it was just a bad prank, but it evolved into ridiculous rumors. By then, the entire village was buzzing with false stories about Livia and Phedum’s relationship.

The rumors grew so severe that people even said Livia had lured Phedum into a cave and had relations with him multiple times.

Since Livia had been so gentle and quiet from a young age, the villagers didn’t believe it at first. But as the exaggerated rumors spread daily, eventually, no one believed Livia anymore.

“You bastard…!”

In the end, unable to hold back, her father and Iason rushed to Phedum’s house.

“If Livia had behaved properly from the start, such rumors wouldn’t have spread. Why are you acting like this? Our Phedum is the one suffering!”

The argument, which began politely, went awry when Phedum pushed Iason down the stairs. Seeing Iason’s ankle twist, Livia lost her temper and smashed a rock into Phedum’s face.

“Ugh, ugh! Mom!”

Phedum’s face was covered in Blood, Maya screamed, and Livia, still not satisfied, ripped out clumps of Phedum’s hair as he screamed.

Who had been the most gentle and quiet child in this village until now? It was Livia Horn. She had never raised her voice, was kind to everyone, and often ran errands for the village elders.

She didn’t want to bring shame to her family and wanted to be a proud sister to Iason and Lete. She loved this family she had finally gained so much.

Livia had suppressed her personality and willingly became a good child out of gratitude.

But because of that, she became a target, and because of that, she seemed even easier to exploit.

That day, because of the incident, Phedum lost sight in one eye. Maya went half-mad, cursing Livia every day.

In the end, the village elders mediated, saying that since Phedum spread bad rumors about Livia and Livia blinded Phedum, the two should take responsibility for each other’s lives.

It had been an absurd mediation. Livia still couldn’t comprehend how anyone could consider it a resolution.

The dim-witted Phedum accepted it gladly, but Livia was against it. Naturally, her father and Iason also vehemently opposed it.

“If coexistence is impossible, then one must leave. Just remember that the greater sin lies with Livia, who caused a young man permanent injury.”

If they didn’t accept the engagement, it meant they would be expelled from the village.

“Livia, don’t worry. Wherever we go, we won’t starve.”

None of her family blamed Livia. Even though they faced expulsion from the place where they had lived since she was born, no one held Livia responsible. They all insisted there was nothing to blame her for.

“That’s right. Livia did nothing wrong.”

Iason reassured her with a pat on the head, and even her young brother, who rolled up his sleeves, declared he’d do something about it.

Livia understood how much this place meant to them. Her mother’s grave, someone she had never seen, was also nearby. Her father visited her mother every morning without fail. They were being told to leave such a place. That they had to leave….

So, she thought she just had to endure it. That was why she accepted the forced engagement.

Yet…

She should have left back then. If she had, perhaps this tragedy might not have occurred. But looking back only brought meaningless regret that struck her heart.

With empty eyes, Livia stared at the cliff for a long time before swimming to the deserted beach as the sun began to set.

When she finally stepped onto land after so long, her body felt incredibly heavy.

The sensation against her soles was also painful. It was fascinating how everything about the land felt so unfamiliar after just a few days at sea.

Taking a deep breath, Livia headed towards the western hills of Archel.

It was where the temple of Pan, the god of shepherds, was located.



The temple of Pan was old and shabby.

So much so that it was almost embarrassing to call it a temple; it looked more like a hut. As the village was one of shepherds, they had built it as a formality, but it was dirty and musty because no one visited.

After roughly cleaning the old temple, Livia sat down and began to make a reed flute.

They called a flute made of reeds a syrinx. It was named after the nymph who, pursued by Pan, transformed into reeds.

Thanks to Iason, who had taught her how to make flutes, she was able to do it here. As she wove the reeds together, her brother’s voice, teaching her how to weave, came to mind.

“You have to weave it a bit tighter. That way, the sound won’t waver.”

“You’re good at this. You must have inherited my dexterity.”

“If you’re bored, you can learn to play the flute. They say Pan loves the sound of these reed flutes.”

Following Iason’s instructions, she brought the sturdy flute to her lips. As she blew into it, a clear sound, almost unbelievable for something made of reeds, resonated far and wide.

She poured her prayers, which words could not express, into the flute’s sound, earnestly wishing. Please appear. Please, please….

How much time had passed?

A breeze seemed to blow from somewhere, carrying a strong musty odor, and soon a small goat hopped into the temple.

Startled, Livia’s eyes widened, and the little goat, as if it belonged there, leapt onto the altar, stood on two legs, and spoke in a solemn voice.

“O foolish and wise shepherd, what do you seek from me?”

It was Pan.

Livia lifted her head quickly and mouthed her plea.

‘O Pan, god of shepherds, please help me take revenge on the cruel man who violated and destroyed your creatures.’

The god of the woods, who had been silently observing her, tilted his head and spoke.

“Can’t you speak?”

Livia nodded, feeling as if she might die from frustration. She silently cursed Triton, who had stolen her voice, but it was a curse without sound.

“Hmm?”

The god stepped down from the altar and stood before Livia. His rough, coarse hand grasped her head. She thought it smelled of earth, and then she felt something probing inside her mind. As she shuddered at the unsettling sensation and tried to step back, the god said,

“I’m just trying to see your memories. If you resist too much, I can’t learn anything.”

At his words, Livia reluctantly relaxed. The force invading her mind was uncomfortable.

“You’re a stubborn woman. Hmm… You are entangled with a sea god. He’s known to be very strict and cold. He took your voice too.”

After struggling to read a few of Livia’s memories, Pan furrowed his brow. The god let out a troubled hum and began pacing around the altar, muttering to himself.

“This is a problem. I don’t want to get involved with him.”

His words struck like a bolt from the blue. Livia immediately grabbed his ankle and opened her mouth silently.

“Uh, ah… uh… uh…!”

‘Didn’t you hear the cries of the sheep? Didn’t you hear the screams of my family, who cared for your flock, as they burned to death? What about my prayers that fell off the cliff? If you’re going to pretend you didn’t hear anything, why do you bear the name of the god of shepherds?’

The god of the woods, who had been looking down at her with his head tilted, sighed and tapped her throat with his hoof.

“I don’t understand a word you’re saying, so I’ll return your voice for a moment. Keep it a secret from him.”



Livia’s eyes widened in surprise, and the god’s eyes narrowed for a moment. His eyes, resembling those of a goat, elongated vertically, revealing greed, but Livia didn’t notice.

“Don’t repel my power like before.”

Pan whispered in a suddenly gentle voice as he placed his hand on Livia’s neck. The earthy smell returned, and her throat felt refreshed.

“Alright. Speak.”

“Thank you, thank you…!”

Overwhelmed with emotion at hearing her own voice after so long, Livia thanked Pan repeatedly. She felt like cheering, but that wasn’t the priority right now.

Livia immediately bowed and whispered, “O god, please help me take revenge on the cruel man who violated and destroyed your creatures.”

The god of the woods responded in a generous voice, “If you wish to take revenge on him, do not worry. He has already been punished, and so has his mother. If you wait a little longer, your enemy’s corpse will roll to your feet.”

No, that wasn’t the kind of revenge Livia wanted.

“That is not my revenge. I cannot wait until he dies. Also, I do not wish for him to die peacefully. The villagers who sided with him are no different. O god, please help this poor shepherd take her revenge.”

At her urgent words, the god clicked his tongue and turned away.

“That is not my responsibility; it is yours.”

Livia was disheartened by his cold response. The god of the woods wasn’t wrong. But she couldn’t just give up.

“We are the ones who cared for your sheep. How can the shepherd’s grudge not be yours? You are heartless. Surely you know the devotion with which my family and I have tended to your flock!”

At her bold words, the god’s shoulders flinched. Clearing his throat, he turned only his head to gaze at Livia and whispered in a secretive tone.

“Alright. I might be able to help you. But this isn’t a wish I can grant for just a single horn.”

“Then…?”

In response to Livia’s question, the god of the woods swiftly turned to face her.

His vertically slit eyes gleamed with cunning as the form of a young goat transformed into that of an adult. In a flash, his upper body shifted into the shape of a man covered in shaggy fur.

Now fully matured, the god of the woods licked his lips and whispered wickedly.

“Offer your body to me. If you open yourself to me, I’ll gladly assist you.”

Startled, Livia looked at him as he lunged at her, unable to hold back any longer.

She had heard that the god of the woods was shameless, lecherous, and a scoundrel, but she never imagined he could change his demeanor so quickly from that of a harmless goat.

Livia quickly rolled backward to evade him while simultaneously drawing a golden dagger from her wrist and thrusting it forward. The god of the woods, not recognizing the dagger, chuckled and leaped at Livia once more.

Perhaps it was a stroke of luck. Until now, she hadn’t known how effective this dagger would be against a ‘god,’ but she decided to find out by swinging it with all her might.

Rip!

“Gah!”

The god’s chest was slashed open horizontally, spilling red Blood. Shocked, he staggered back, exclaiming.

“Could it be…!”

“It’s a dagger that can harm gods.”

“How did you come to possess such a thing?”

“It seems you couldn’t read that far when you were skimming through my memories.”

The god’s face flushed as if she had struck a nerve. It seemed there was a difference in the level of divine power, making it difficult for him to read more than fragments of her recent past.

Being a woman associated with a sea god, the memories he could access were limited to recent snippets.

‘I messed with the wrong person.’

Having been deprived of nymphs lately, he had revealed his true nature too hastily.

Yet, Killing this human woman wasn’t an option either, considering the ‘trial’ she was undergoing from the sea god.

The situation was unfavorable in many ways. To be precise, it was just bad luck.

“Calling upon a god while holding such a thing! You wretch! Get out of here at once!”

Leaving the furious god of the woods behind, Livia fled from his temple. Panting heavily, she finally collapsed to the ground after running for a while.

She had nearly been caught up in something terrible. Her limbs trembled, but nothing had happened, so it was alright.

It’s alright.

It’s alright.

Taking a deep breath, Livia stood up. The god of the woods wasn’t a higher deity anyway, so she hadn’t placed much hope in him. It was time to find another god who could help her.



She needed a sacrifice.

As soon as she made up her mind, Livia headed to the eastern hill where the village chief’s sheep pen was located. The chief’s shepherd dog barked briefly but wagged its tail upon recognizing Livia.

‘I’m sorry, Lubo.’

After patting Lubo’s head, Livia made her way to the sheep pen. There were more sheep than the last time she had seen them. She even spotted a sheep she recognized. The sheep seemed to recognize her too, waking from its slumber to look at her.



Livia gazed at the sheep for a moment before turning away. She then led the chief’s prized ram out.

All the equipment outside was familiar. As expected, they must have taken it, thinking it would be a waste to leave ownerless sheep and belongings behind, pretending to be wise.

Livia raised the well-sharpened sickle high. Such rough tasks had always been her father’s responsibility. On days when sheep were slaughtered, he wouldn’t let Livia near, telling her there was no need to witness such sights and sending Iason or Lete on errands instead.

Although she had lived as a shepherd for a long time, Livia couldn’t help but be awkward with such tasks.

Nevertheless, Livia managed to accomplish it. It wasn’t easy, but it was necessary. She carefully packed the remains into a few leather pouches and sprinted down the hill.

The sensation of Blood on her fingertips lingered. Even after washing her hands, that warm and dreadful feeling seemed to crawl up her skin.

This was nothing.

She had sworn to cut out the heart of a god, so she couldn’t tremble just from Killing a single sheep. Gritting her teeth, Livia descended the hill and headed straight for the site of her burnt-down home.

The god she sought this time was Nemesis, the goddess of vengeance.

Unfortunately, there was no temple of Nemesis in Livia’s area. But what kind of goddess was she? She was the goddess of vengeance.

Livia stopped in front of the burnt-down hut.



There was nothing left but a charred plot of land, not even a frame remained. The burnt house, the broken and open barn door, the empty sheep pen.

It was nothing short of a wasteland. Livia, standing blankly in front of the tomb of memories that had completely vanished, slowly built a small altar.

Rage tore at her chest. Grief split her apart.

Yet, it was vengeance that kept her alive.

Livia placed the heart and head of the sheep she had brought on the hastily made stone altar and prayed fervently. Fortunately, the wretched lustful god had returned her voice.

“Goddess of vengeance, I am your most devoted follower. I am willing to do anything for revenge! So please, if you hear my earnest prayer, answer me!”

Perhaps her desperate prayer was heard, for soon, a voice spoke, belonging to the goddess of vengeance.

“My child, I have been watching over you. Your revenge is rightful and just. But, my child, isn’t it the villagers who slaughtered your family that you truly need to avenge, not the sea god?”

“However, to exact my revenge, I need the heart of the sea god.”

“Poor child. Even for a god, harming the sea god is a difficult task. I cannot take that risk for a mere human’s revenge, especially when it is not even my own. It is neither within my power nor your true desire.”

The goddess was right.

Her true goal was to avenge herself on the villagers who killed her family, and on Phedum and Maya. Approaching Triton to split his heart was merely a step in the process, not her ultimate aim.

“So, pursue your own revenge entirely.”

As the whispering voice of the goddess faded, a small pouch suddenly dropped in front of Livia.

With trembling hands, Livia opened the pouch.

“May you ignite the most brilliant flame of vengeance.”

Crackle!

Inside was a pile of ash that wouldn’t extinguish, even without wind.



“…Did she go to the mainland?”

Triton, who had been playing with the young clownfish when he received Phorkys’ report, turned his head. He noticed that the human woman who usually lingered nearby was absent, so he asked Phorkys about it, and this was the answer he received.

“Where to?”

“It seems she went to her hometown. However…”

Phorkys, elongating his words as if gauging Triton’s reaction, added cautiously, “According to the sharks, a certain dolphin appeared and gave her a ride.”

A dolphin…

The fact that a dolphin had carried a human woman to land indicated it was no ordinary dolphin. It was outside his domain, an unusual dolphin.

Which meant…

“…Mother has intervened.”

It was likely Amphitrite’s dolphin. At Triton’s words, Phorkys nodded with a serious expression.

“Shall I investigate?”

“No, leave it be.”

Triton waved his hand to dismiss Phorkys’ concerns. The goddess often found life dull and meddled everywhere. However, she wasn’t on particularly good terms with the god, and the couple had long lived separate lives, making their tumultuous union seem insignificant.

“Then what should we do about the human woman? Shouldn’t we bring her back?”

Upon his loyal subject’s report, Triton stroked his chin, seemingly pondering. Wasn’t her entire family slaughtered?

After bringing her to the castle, Triton had conducted a little investigation of his own. It wasn’t extensive, but it was enough to understand the full story.

In a small village where livestock farming was prevalent, a strange disease began Killing sheep one day… The villagers found it odd that only the sheep raised by Livia Horn were unharmed.

In reality, they were simply jealous and displeased that only her sheep were healthy.

It seemed there was a woman among them with a natural talent for causing trouble. The humans, always looking for an opportunity, readily fell for her words and slaughtered the human woman’s entire family, seizing their barn and sheep. The incident was that simple in its entirety.

For the victims, it was an unjust and infuriating situation…

So what could that human woman do by going there? At most, she would strengthen her resolve and return. There was no grand temple in that shabby village, after all.

“No need for that. Just tell the sharks to keep an eye on her.”

After giving a simple order, Triton reached out to the playful clownfish. One particularly red clownfish eyed him warily from between his fingers. Its fierce gaze, unusual for such a small fish, reminded him of Livia. Things that could be crushed with a squeeze of his hand, yet their gaze was fierce…

How furious will you be when you return?

With a slight smile, he clenched his palm. The small creature trembling in his hand was rather endearing.

To the point where he wanted to keep holding it.


Dum-dum-dum—

Somewhere, a drumbeat echoed. Since there was no one playing a drum, it was undoubtedly the sound of Livia’s heart, which had grown as loud as a drum.

Livia stood at the entrance of the village, gazing silently at the place where she had been born and raised.

It was a small rural village with only a few hundred people. It wasn’t affluent, but it wasn’t lacking either, so there was no particular discord.

However, where people gather, rumors are inevitable, and this small village was always buzzing with dirty gossip.

Maya was a woman who knew well how powerful such rumors could be in this little village. She had often been at the center of them herself.

“Someone sneaked into Maya’s house last night,” they said.

“The village chief and Maya are in a questionable relationship,” they said.

“Maya’s house always has nighttime visitors,” they said…

And as if to prove the rumors true, Maya always monopolized the benefits provided by the village. She managed to live comfortably without doing much work.

Yet, it seemed she thought that wasn’t enough. In fact, Maya’s first target had been Livia’s father, Rugis.

But Rugis, who hadn’t looked at another woman even after his wife passed away, pushed her away in disgust. After that, Phedum approached Livia.

Livia’s house had the most sheep in the village, and Iason was skilled at building boats and fishing, so their home was always well-stocked with food.

Lete was good with his hands and cooked well, so Livia’s household lacked nothing.

It might have been speculation, but it felt like they deliberately approached to take what they had.

Finally, as Livia stood staring at the darkness of the village, a spark ignited in her eyes.

The villagers were no different from Maya.

They shared Livia’s sheep among themselves, filled Maya’s storehouse, and Phedum fished using Iason’s boat.

Dum-dum-dum.

Her heart pounded like a drum. Standing in front of Maya’s storehouse, Livia clenched the ashes granted by Nemesis, the goddess of revenge.

Perhaps today, her revenge would end. The thought was both empty and liberating.

Then, what about the contract with the witch?

With her target gone, it might become void, but would the witch let her go so easily?

And if the contract with the witch became void… what about the wager she made with Triton? Would that end as well? Would he let her go? Or would he come after her for deceiving a god?

…Well, it didn’t matter.

If the witch desired, Livia was willing to give her life back into her hands. She could continue being a puppet, carrying out futile attacks, or continue enduring the trials set by Triton. She might even face ruin.

So be it. With eyes filled with madness, Livia tightly gripped Nemesis’s ashes. And without hesitation, she threw them at Maya’s house.



Something pitch-black lunged and snatched the pouch. Startled, she looked, and a black snake, with Nemesis’s pouch in its mouth, turned to face Livia.

The snake’s chilling eyes bore into her. The moment she sensed something was amiss, the snake’s form changed with a wisp-like smoke.

“We can’t have you ruining our contract like this.”

Echidna…!

The black witch held the pouch of Nemesis that Livia had thrown, glaring fiercely at her. How did she know to be here? Why?

As Livia watched the witch with wary eyes, the witch smiled and lifted Nemesis’s pouch. The ashes of the goddess slipped down her throat.

“What are you doing…?”

Startled, Livia instinctively stepped forward, but it was already too late; the ashes had been swallowed.

At that moment, one of Echidna’s fingers snapped off and fell to the ground. Echidna glanced at her severed finger, which was turning to ash and scattering into the air, as if she had swallowed something bitter.

“Nemesis, you pretended not to hear my voice for so long… yet you’re so generous to this mere human.”

The mocking witch soon fixed her terrifying gaze on Livia. Her piercing eyes sparked with black fire.

“Who saved you when you almost drowned at sea? It was me. Who gave you the chance for revenge after you survived? It was me. Therefore, your life now belongs to me. I saved you and breathed life into you. And now you betray me?”

“You can take back my life if you wish. If you want, I will strive for your revenge to the end. Even if Triton strangles me, don’t interfere with my revenge! Please…!”

“Impossible! How weak is the will of a human who has achieved their goal! It’s as futile as a candle flame that has lost its wick. Honor the contract. If not….”

As the witch waved her hand in the air, gray smoke gathered and a black flame with a white glow appeared.

“Touch it.”

Though anxiety surged, Livia couldn’t help but reach out. Her trembling fingertips touched the white glow.

At that moment, Livia’s face twisted in agony.

“Lete…?”

Lete’s spirit was trapped inside a dark cave. Whether he had crossed the river of forgetfulness or not, his once bright eyes were now dim, but it was indeed Lete.

The boy sitting alone in the darkness was unmistakably Livia’s younger brother, Lete.

“Lete!”

“I barely snatched him from the afterlife. For you.”

The witch whispered with a sweet voice, lifting Livia’s chin. Her tear-filled eyes burned fiercely. They were exactly the eyes the witch desired—filled with madness, malice, defiance, and determination.

“Act according to the contract, human. You seek my revenge, and I seek yours.”

Echidna’s cracked voice seared through Livia’s ears. It shook her mind and soul. Only then did Livia truly understand what she had allied herself with.

A ‘witch’ who would do anything for revenge. Someone who perhaps harbored a grudge far deeper and darker than Livia could ever compare to.

The witch’s touch, which had been caressing Livia’s chin, dissipated into the air.

In the blink of an eye, the witch vanished completely, leaving Livia to finally release the scream she had been holding back.

“Aaaah!”

Startled by the noise, Maya woke up and rushed outside, only to see a woman with red hair running off into the distance. She fell backward in shock.

“L-Livia Horn?”

She vividly remembered seeing Livia jump off the cliff—a height that no one could survive. Was that a ghost? Was she seeing things?

With trembling legs, Maya hurried back inside the house. Even after slamming the door shut and carefully drawing the curtains, she couldn’t stop shaking.

The ominous feeling lingered until morning.



‘…Of course, revenge wouldn’t end this easily.’

Sitting on the cliff from which she had jumped, Livia let out a small laugh as she gazed at the sea.

It was the time when the dim light of dawn began to spread over the dark waters. Livia suddenly felt a deep sense of loneliness. Then, by pure chance, she recalled something the queen of the underworld had said.

“If you ever want to see this little dog, I can engrave a mark so you can call him anytime you want. Whenever you miss him, whenever you need him.”

Livia gently touched the pomegranate-shaped mark on the inside of her wrist. Could she really see him again? She didn’t doubt the goddess’s words, but she was quite nervous. After taking a short, deep breath, Livia slowly spoke.

“Mumu.”

As if responding to Livia’s voice, the pomegranate-shaped mark turned red, and something large appeared in a swirl of gray smoke.

“…Mumu?”

Calling out the dog’s name with a trembling voice, she heard a loud bark through the dissipating gray smoke.

In her now-clear view, a large dog with three heads spotted Livia and ran toward her.

“Mumu! You really came out!”

Woof, woof woof!

The sound of three heads barking at once echoed loudly. Strangely enough, that booming noise was a welcome one.

Livia opened her arms and hugged the most lovable dog from the underworld.

Mumu, Mumu…

He was the only loyal friend and family member who had returned to her side without dying. As she rubbed her cheek against his sulfur-scented, fluffy fur, Mumu rested his head against her, as if to embrace her. The intense heat from the dog comforted her.

The last time she had seen him, he was barely big enough to reach her calf, but now he had grown large enough for Livia to fully embrace.

“It seems you’re not starving over there. You’re quite sturdy. I’m really glad.”

At Livia’s words, the middle head of Mumu smacked his lips as if he remembered something. She briefly wondered what a hellhound might eat but dismissed the thought. It probably wasn’t anything normal, so she figured she didn’t need to know.

“The goddess really did send you to me. I’m so grateful…”

Livia rubbed her eyes, which had grown hot with emotion, with the back of her hand and expressed her gratitude to Persephone. She held the dog close, savoring the warmth for a long time.

She hadn’t realized it while she was in the sea, but once she was back on land, it became clear.

Down there, it had been too cold for her. Livia, who loved the mountains, fields, and sunlight, found the dark and damp place particularly challenging.

Of course, it was incredibly mysterious and beautiful, almost mind-bogglingly so, but it was filled with enemies.

Reflecting on it, from the time her family died until now, she hadn’t had a single day where she could rest her mind and body. It wasn’t that she felt sorry for herself, but it was a bit exhausting.

So, for now, she just wanted to let her guard down for a moment.

Livia held Mumu until the sun fully rose. The dog didn’t whine and simply offered his embrace, licking her cheeks and chin.

“That tickles.”

She burst into laughter for a moment. Strangely, after laughing, energy returned to her tired body.

Yes, this was enough.

After giving Mumu’s shoulder one more firm hug, Livia sent the dog back to the underworld.

With Lete’s soul in the hands of a witch, she had one more task to accomplish.

‘I have to rescue Lete.’

For that, she needed strength. She couldn’t bear the thought of her young brother being alone in such a cold and dark place.

The idea that her kind and gentle brother’s soul was captured, unable to rest peacefully, broke her heart.

She hadn’t anticipated it and therefore hadn’t prepared. She never imagined Echidna would go so far as to meddle with souls that had crossed the river of the underworld. She was a far more ruthless woman than Livia had ever thought.

A cold chill ran through Livia’s heart.

No matter what, she wouldn’t let things go according to that woman’s plan. A resolute determination settled quietly in her fiery eyes.



Shortly after returning to the sea, the second trial began.

“Face the leech-like creatures rising from the underground, Livia. With that insignificant human body of yours, let’s see how long you can last.”

Livia fell from a deep precipice, landing amidst a pile of bones that had turned to white skeletons.

However, the situation wasn’t as hopeless as she had feared. The cliff was deep, but there were protruding rocks and ledges that she could use to climb back up.

It had been frightening, but not unbearable. Paradoxically, this made Livia Horn uneasy. There was no way the trial set by that person could be this simple.

Livia held her breath, waiting for the ‘something’ she was sure would come. There had to be more than this. More than this…

Then it happened.

Scratch, scratch, scratch, scratch.

An eerie, chilling sound reached her ears. It was so faint at first that she could barely hear it, but it grew louder and quickly approached.

Scratch, scratch, scratch, scratch. Scratch, scratch, scratch, scratch. Scratch, scratch, scratch, scratch. Scratch, scratch, scratch, scratch. Scratch, scratch, scratch, scratch. Scratch, scratch, scratch, scratch. Scratch, scratch, scratch, scratch. Scratch, scratch, scratch, scratch. Scratch, scratch, scratch, scratch. Scratch, scratch, scratch, scratch.

They were coming.

As tension built to the point where it was hard to breathe, black creatures began crawling up from the white bones piled at her feet.



Thousands of insects with sharp teeth charged at Livia.



“Will she survive this time as well?”

As Triton’s low voice echoed while he stared into the darkness, Dugong and Actius, who stood by his side, responded solemnly.

“No, this time, we must put an end to all those bugs.”

“Indeed. How dare those filthy creatures infest the ocean depths…! They should not exist!”

Triton frowned slightly, looking at them as if questioning their words, but then he realized the situation and let out a sound of understanding.

Come to think of it, they had been waiting for the Titan leeches. He glanced down at his hand, which held the trident, with a dry smile.

The faint scar on the back of his hand had been left deliberately unhealed. It was from when that human woman had ambushed him while hanging from his bedpost.

Even as she was being strangled, she had tried to fight back by biting his fingers. That pathetic attack had been more amusing than threatening.

“The only instinct I know of in humans is just one.”

“And what is that?”

“…Survival. Simply, the will to live.”

Despite saying that, her eyes had a blind determination that didn’t shy away from death.

All for the sake of avenging her family, she had endured her body being broken, swallowed the dregs of the sewer, and withstood the agony of her flesh and bones being torn apart alive.

He couldn’t understand it. Weren’t humans inherently weak creatures?

They were born that way, and their limitations were clear: soft flesh, bones that broke easily, limited time, predetermined lifespans…

Because of this, they pursued the present. They reacted strongly to even the slightest pain and lost themselves in trivial pleasures.

They would wail inconsolably when their children died, and sometimes, for power, they would strangle the partner they had loved all their lives. Creatures full of contradictions and frailty.

Such was humanity, so why did she repeatedly risk her life in pursuit of revenge?

His interest in the human woman grew a little more each day. Like ripples cast on a calm surface, she brought small bits of excitement to his otherwise dull life.

For that alone, the words that human woman had spoken had proven their worth. As he recalled the determined look in the woman’s eyes as she scratched at the back of his hand, a familiar warmth spread in his lower abdomen.

Somehow, staring into those green eyes made the area below his waist itch. Unlike his father or the great god, he didn’t have a habit of flaunting his lower body whenever he pleased.

However, while he had experienced desire before, he had never been consumed by it. So this reaction was merely lust, not true desire.

“They’re here.”

At Dugong’s words, Triton casually pushed aside his thoughts and turned his head. In the deep darkness of the ocean floor, the tentacles of the giant leeches began to emerge.

The worms of the sea.

These creatures, akin to leeches at the bottom of the sea, fed on the Titans’ lifeblood and crawled out at their host’s command.

“Let’s go.”

Triton’s eyes turned cold. The blue trident, a symbol of the sea god, cut through the currents as it surged forward with power.



They were truly vicious creatures. Though they moved rather slowly, about the size of an adult’s palm, they were terrifyingly persistent. No matter how many were killed, they kept emerging relentlessly from the dark crevices.

Livia, who had been tirelessly crushing the bugs with her sword, finally couldn’t hold back and called out to Mumu.

The flames spewed by the hellhound were powerful, but the location was not ideal. After all, this was underwater. No matter how extraordinary Mumu’s flames were, there were limits.

‘…What should I do?’

Cornered, Livia gritted her teeth as she hid Mumu behind her. The endless swarm of bugs was a problem, but the bigger issue was the walls.

She was trapped in a large pit, and escaping it was extremely difficult. The walls were coated with green slime, making them incredibly slippery.

Growl! Yelp! Yip!

In a moment of inattention, dozens of leech-like bugs clung to Mumu’s thigh.

“Mumu!”

Livia rushed over to pull the bugs off. The bugs bit into Livia’s hands, but she didn’t care. What mattered more to her was Mumu.

“This won’t do, Mumu. You need to go back before you get hurt more.”

The dog, now larger than Livia, shook its head vigorously.

Even as it staggered, it continued to spew flames, now reduced to less than half their usual power. The sight of the dog, which had returned to protect its master even in death, pained Livia.

‘If only I were stronger. If only I were wiser…’

With tears clouding her vision, Livia gritted her teeth and, as if making a decision, slashed her own forearm with her sword.

After being immersed in the River Styx, her skin had become nearly impervious to harm, but self-inflicted wounds were an exception. The blade cut through her skin, leaving a deep red gash that bled profusely.

Livia used her Blood-stained blade to stab and kill the bugs. The long, sharp blade skewered the bodies of the insects like a shish kebab.

In her haste, Livia plunged the blade into the ground, carving the name of a sacred god into the earth to create a makeshift altar. She then whispered the goddess’s name with desperation.

“Goddess of wisdom and war, of weaving and maidens, Athena Glaukopis, please grant me your wisdom.”

Athena was known as the protector of heroes facing trials from the gods. Even though Livia’s trial wasn’t as grand as those of heroes, she believed Athena was the only deity who could aid her in this ‘trial.’

And, in fact, there was another crucial reason.

Athena was also known as the goddess who punished Medusa, the woman with snake hair. It was said that Chrysaor was born from the place where Medusa died.

Chrysaor, the true owner of the golden dagger and the father of Echidna.

So perhaps, just maybe, this goddess of wisdom would hear her voice.

Livia knelt by the blade she had driven into the ground, waiting steadfastly for the divine. Bugs that had avoided Mumu’s flames began to gnaw at her skin. Their teeth were so sharp that even her skin, blessed by the River Styx, was wounded.

Yet Livia waited. She waited and waited. Though her heart was anxious, she maintained her composure, showing no outward sign of distress.

At that moment, a bug crawled under her skirt and burrowed into her thigh. Startled, Livia gasped and endured the horrifying sensation, but it became increasingly difficult to bear. Just as the bug crept deeper between her legs, Livia squeezed her eyes shut.

‘I can’t take it anymore. I can’t endure this.’ At that desperate moment, a silver spear flew down and planted itself vertically in front of Livia.

With a clang, a clear and pure breeze swept through. In that gentle wind, all the bugs clinging to Livia’s body were blown away. Surprised, she opened her eyes to see an olive wood spear vibrating with the goddess’s voice.

“Child walking the path of trials, what assistance do you seek?”

A cold voice spoke directly to Livia’s soul. Bowing her head quickly, Livia hurriedly responded.

“Great and wise goddess, please show this humble one a way to overcome this trial.”

The Titan’s bugs were endless. To escape here, she needed to climb the wall. ‘Use the wooden spear I have given you,’ the goddess instructed without hesitation.

Livia bowed her head even lower, offering her gratitude.

However, even after providing an answer, the goddess did not disappear. A brief silence followed, but Livia sensed the goddess’s continued presence. After a moment of contemplation, the goddess spoke again.

“The end of vengeance is ultimately destruction. Wise child, do you intend to walk this path despite knowing this?”

The goddess of wisdom seemed to already know of Livia’s quest for vengeance. Unlike the woodland god, the goddess’s authority overwhelmed Livia. After a moment’s hesitation, Livia answered in a careful voice.

“I have already taken the first step. I can’t turn back, so I wish to see it through to the end.”

“You have a point. The tapestry of fate is woven, and the goddesses have already begun to spin the wheel according to it…. So, child, is there any wisdom you seek from me on this path of vengeance?”

The goddess’s voice was friendly, prompting Livia to think quickly.

Goddess Nemesis had mentioned that even among the gods, none wanted to openly oppose the sea god.

As far as Livia knew, the goddess of wisdom was much older than the sea god, but she doubted Athena would want to challenge Triton for the sake of a mere human with no ties to her.

Thus, there was only one wish Livia could ask of Athena for wisdom.

“Please grant me your wise eyes. The witch Echidna has taken my brother’s soul hostage. What must I do to save him? Also, I’m curious if there’s a way to avoid being bound by a contract with Echidna.”

If Echidna was indeed a descendant of Medusa, Athena couldn’t be favorable toward her. Moreover, everyone knew how proud and dignified Athena was, even those who didn’t worship her.

“Echidna, Echidna… you’re a clever child, to bring up that name to me.”

At the goddess’s words, Livia bowed deeply, indicating she had no intention of causing discomfort. The goddess seemed to ponder for a moment before giving an unexpected answer.

“Die at Triton’s hands and go to the underworld. There, someone awaits you. He will help you find your brother.”

Someone waiting for me in the underworld? Who could that be?

‘Could it be that old man from last time?’

But he was on Echidna’s side, so he wouldn’t help Livia. Then who could it be?

Suddenly, Livia recalled a man who wielded darkness and was as beautiful as the night sky—the very man who had pierced her shoulder with a giant bow. What was his name again?

‘Zagreus.’

As soon as she remembered the name, the wound behind her shoulder grew warm. Who was he? A mere minor god of death? That seemed unlikely, considering how Persephone’s daemons treated him.

“As for the contract with Echidna, I don’t have much information, so it’s hard to give a precise answer. But….”

The goddess’s voice paused briefly, and then letters made of light flashed in the air. It was the word for a jar, ‘hudria.’

“Remember this character. And when a black snake appears, place it inside this character. It will protect you from the snake.”

While Livia etched the character the goddess showed her into her mind, the leather pouch placed on the altar turned to ash and scattered into the air. At the same time, the goddess’s voice also faded away.

“But child, remember this: even if the contract with Echidna is severed, your fate has already begun….”

The voice that tickled her ears like a whispering wind disappeared. Simultaneously, the goddess’s protective power also vanished from Livia.

Rustle, rustle, rustle, rustle, rustle, rustle, rustle, rustle….

The sound of the bugs’ footsteps returned. Livia tightly gripped the olive wood spear the goddess had planted in the ground and looked toward the wall.

It was time to escape.



Amidst the mountain of insect corpses, Triton suddenly came to his senses.

‘How much time has passed?’

He brushed off the insect fragments clinging to his trident and looked up at the sky. Beyond the glowing jellyfish undulating like waves, he could faintly feel the sunlight from a great height.

It was the third Apollo since that day.

So it must have been about three days.

He wasn’t used to counting time itself, so it felt strange. Counting the days only amused him more. To think it took three days just to exterminate these bugs.

As Triton surveyed the black trench with cool eyes, Actius, who had been calming the giant sharks prowling around, hurried over to report.

“We’ve completely annihilated the ones trying to escape. This should keep things under control for a while.”

The mention of “for a while” deepened the crease in Triton’s brow. His dimly glowing eyes showed a hint of irritation, but there was nothing more he could do at the moment.

He swung the hand holding the trident, and with a small splash, the weapon vanished in an instant. At that moment, he looked upward.

The glow of the luminescent jellyfish, arranged for battle, seemed excessively romantic, sharply contrasting with the grim scene.

Triton casually crushed a leech worm wriggling persistently under his foot. Its hard shell cracked, spilling its innards.

These leech worms, each about the size of a man’s face, were revolting to behold and had an appetite greater than most carnivorous animals.

While they weren’t difficult to kill, their overwhelming numbers posed a problem. If not regularly culled, they would quickly overrun the ocean floor.

These creatures were controlled by the Titans sealed deep below, released to create an opportunity for escape.

That human woman had fallen right into the place where these leech worms’ larvae were gathered.

Triton often used this spot as an execution ground for humans who polluted the deep sea, as well as guilty fairies and nymphs.

Occasionally, some peculiar ones managed to climb that high wall and survive. If they showed such determination, he would commend their will and let them live.

Of course, while climbing the wall, the poison from the worms’ bites would spread, ensuring they wouldn’t live long. But wasn’t that a generous act?

So then.

Was the woman alive or dead?

He couldn’t sense death, so it seemed she was alive, but whether she was ‘not yet’ dead or had ‘actually’ survived was unclear.

He glanced again toward the golden castle. His gaze lingered there for a while, a hint of impatience in his demeanor.

Even though he had personally imposed a trial that could lead to death, Triton hoped the human woman hadn’t died. He found joy in seeing her endure, persist, and stubbornly return to him. Therefore, Livia had to endure the trial but not die. She had to survive and crawl back to him, no matter what.

That contradiction created a crack somewhere in Triton’s heart, though it was a faint fissure he hadn’t realized. Even if he had noticed the signs of the crack, he ignored them. After all, acknowledging it wouldn’t change anything.

“Leave the remnants to the soldiers; we’re heading back.”

At Triton’s command, the soldiers moved with perfect coordination. He watched them handle the corpse fragments before lightly stamping his foot.

The current surrounding him surged, swiftly guiding him back to the castle. With a light gesture, he washed away the traces of battle from his body and strode purposefully toward his chamber.

Although it hadn’t been particularly strenuous, he did need some rest.

He didn’t particularly like sleeping, as Morpheus often played tricks on him, but there was no more convenient way to pass dull time than sleeping.

Just as Triton was about to lie down on the thickly cushioned anemone bed, something dropped from the ceiling as if it had been waiting.

With wounded hands, she clutched a golden dagger and aimed it precisely at his heart without a moment’s hesitation.

Well, well.

Triton let out a brief laugh as he grabbed the slender wrist. His unusual eyes slowly scanned the bloodied woman straddling him.

“I didn’t expect to see you so soon….”

The woman’s appearance was as pitiful as ever, her bloodshot eyes fixed on him.

Her face, neck, and arms were covered with dozens of bite marks, as if chewed by the worms, and Blood from each wound was smeared all over her body.

Her hair was disheveled, her eyes bloodshot and wild, her body bloodied from the worms’ bites.

The leech worms’ teeth carried poison. It was said to numb pain and induce hallucinations and delusions. No matter how strong one was, it would be difficult to endure with so many bites, yet she was holding on remarkably well.

Despite her condition, she had crawled her way to him. She must have come straight here as soon as she escaped the trench.

Livia’s blind sacrifice and determination were almost admirable. To achieve so much with the will of a frail human. And to think that the target of that will was himself…

A tingling sensation suddenly shot up her spine.

Livia’s hands, trapped by Triton, trembled uncontrollably. She tried with all her might to stab him, but her grip was as ineffective as that of an infant caught by a soldier, unable to move him even slightly.

“Ugh….”

A sob escaped from her clenched teeth. Tears welled up in her bloodshot eyes as she glared at him, as if she wanted to kill him.

Tears? Why? Was she in pain? Or was it from distress? Perhaps shame?

Triton couldn’t guess why the woman was crying. He simply found it curious.

She tried to swallow her tears, her face contorting, but it was a futile resistance. Triton held her bound and waited patiently. Eventually, the collected droplets fell onto his cheek and shoulder with a soft patter.

They were warm and soft. For a moment, they even felt ticklish.

The round droplets falling one by one resembled the gentle drizzle of dew at dawn. His narrowed eyes gazed into her tear-soaked green eyes.

He wondered what it would taste like if he licked them. As if responding to his fleeting curiosity, a tear from her eye fell onto his lips.

Watching her frown in embarrassment, he deliberately licked it up.

It was sweet and lukewarm.

But more than that, what struck him was a sense of ‘lack.’

The fleeting taste that barely moistened his tongue left his mouth dry and his stomach tight. Just a little more…. He wanted to drink deeply, enough to fill his mouth, not just a single drop.

Greedily, ravenously….

As Triton explored this unfamiliar sensation, he let out a brief laugh.

Thirst. It was thirst.

It was an astonishing realization. The sea was water, and water was Triton. He was born from water, grew as part of it, and naturally became its ruler.

The concept of thirst was unknown to him, a word he could perhaps live his entire life without knowing, unless he deliberately sought to understand it.

Yet here he was, feeling it from a single tear of this human woman. It was absurd.

No, discovering a new sensation was actually quite pleasing. It was intriguing and even entertaining.

So then…. If a single drop caused such thirst, would drinking more quench it?

Triton didn’t hesitate. He simply reached out. His long, beautiful hand swiftly grasped her red hair.

“Ah…!”

Her tongue trembled as she gasped. Just as tears were about to flow from her distorted eyes, Triton pulled her closer, licking the bruised corners of her eyes.

Crazy!

Livia stared at Triton with wide eyes in shock. Reflected in her trembling gaze was the face of the sea god, casually licking his lips.

She almost shouted, “What are you doing?” She was hiding the fact that her voice had returned, and she nearly gave herself away. She was so startled that her tears stopped flowing.

Triton pulled the rigid Livia closer to him. Her stiff body resisted, but to no avail.

His cool nose brushed against her neck where her hair had fallen. As goosebumps rose on her sensitized skin from pain, Triton’s low voice whispered in her ear.

“I smell fire….”

A shiver ran up Livia’s spine. She forced herself to fix her gaze on empty space, avoiding Triton’s eyes. Meeting those stormy blue eyes was dangerous, especially when there was something to hide.

“Interesting. How did you bring the smell of fire underwater?”

As he lifted her chin to meet her eyes, Livia quickly turned her head, avoiding Triton’s gaze.

In response to her blatant refusal, Triton merely chuckled.

“Even if I free your tongue, you won’t tell me?”

Of course, with the help of that Damn forest god, her voice had already returned, but Livia was determined not to speak to Triton.

What kind of conversation could happen between two people trying to kill each other? Furthermore, if she mentioned ‘Mumu’ or the assistance of other gods, he would undoubtedly interfere.

Besides, if Triton discovered that Livia could speak again, he might steal her voice once more. Perhaps he would bind her tongue even more thoroughly to prevent any further divine intervention. She couldn’t allow that to happen.

Livia defiantly pressed her lips together.

At that moment, her perspective flipped, and her position changed. Suddenly, she found herself beneath Triton.

Startled, she looked up at him, who tilted his head with a satisfied smirk. His silvery-blue hair, shining like starlight, cascaded over her.

“That’s right.”

With one hand, he held her wrists above her head, while the other cupped her cheek, his fingers brushing over her eyelids.

“That’s how you should look.”

The pressure of his hand was quite rough.

“In truth….”

His fingertips lightly scraped over her thin eyelids, as if….

“I’m aiming for your eyes….”

A chill ran through her body. For some reason, the fear of having her eyes gouged out was more terrifying than the thought of dying.

Livia tried to turn her head away from his touch. Or at least, she attempted to.

But the hand gripping her cheek was strong, and she had to endure it, unable to move an inch.

“If you have no intention of speaking, Livia.”

Startled, Livia looked up at Triton.

Livia.

Hearing her name from Triton’s lips felt strange.

How did he know? Was it because he was a god? Could gods know everything? But if that were true, he wouldn’t be unaware of ‘Mumu’s’ existence. So how did he find out? Triton’s lips curled into a smile, seemingly pleased with her confused expression.

“Try crying more beneath me.”

His smooth hand slid from her cheek down to her neck, tracing the insect bites with his fingertips.

“Don’t look away from my eyes.”

As a sharp sensation caused her to wince, the pressure on her wounds increased. It felt as if moving even slightly would tear her apart.

‘…Maybe this is for the best.’

Athena had said she needed to die in Triton’s grasp. If so, this was the opportunity. The reason she had struggled to survive among the leech-like creatures and crawled all the way here was precisely this.

Livia deliberately avoided his gaze. Doing what she was told not to do would surely provoke him. With his fiery temper, he might kill her again.

Perhaps he would even gouge out her eyes. That was a bit concerning. Would they regenerate if they were removed? Losing her eyes would certainly be inconvenient.

At that moment, her chin was forcibly turned again.

Livia squeezed her eyes shut. She was determined not to look. Absolutely not. That stubborn resolve was etched across her tense face.

Triton, watching her with disbelief, briefly considered plucking out her eyes. Her defiance, doing exactly what she was told not to, was truly infuriating.

When he had scraped her eyelids, she seemed genuinely frightened, yet now she was back to resisting, having lost her fear. Did she lack sense because she was a foolish human? Or did she despise her current situation so much that it outweighed any fear of losing her eyes?

With a cold gaze, he stared intently at the ragged-looking woman before lowering his hand to press on her side, where the flesh was half torn away. He felt her body flinch, but she kept her eyes tightly shut.

Look at that.

As the woman persisted in her stubbornness, Triton felt an odd determination arise within him. He resolved to make her open her eyes on her own.

Triton’s hand moved past her wounds and reached her ankle. Her feet had suffered the most during her climb up the cliff.

Several toes were nearly severed, and bite marks covered her soles and ankles. Additionally, she had lain in a shell grave, covering herself with sand to mask the smell of Blood, leaving her in a pitiful state.

Triton gently grasped her ankle. A faint light wrapped around her slender ankle, and the scabs clinging to Livia’s body began to flake away.

Livia shivered at the strange sensation. She couldn’t grasp what he was doing to her. She tried to focus and understand, but the buzzing sound in her ears made it impossible to concentrate.

“Leech bugs have venom in their teeth, Livia.”

His low voice, reminiscent of the dawn waves, seeped into her ears. Despite the noise, it was remarkably clear and distinct.

“That venom penetrates deep into the body, gradually softening flesh and bone. It makes it easier for the bugs to devour you.”

The touch on her ankle was now incredibly gentle, unlike before. With her eyes closed, her sense of touch became more sensitive, and the buzzing sound transformed into musical notes. Something was off, but she couldn’t figure out what it was.

“And at the same time, it induces hallucinations and auditory illusions, preventing the host from feeling pain.”

Dwoong—

Was it the sound of a conch or a flute? Or perhaps the strings of a giant harp? Or maybe a combination of all those sounds?

Livia shook her head, trying to shake off the hallucinations clouding her mind, but it was futile. The sounds only grew louder.

Everywhere Triton’s fingers touched, the leech bug bite marks vanished, and her original pale skin returned, but Livia couldn’t feel it due to the intensifying hallucinations and auditory illusions.

Before she knew it, Livia was submerged in the deep blue sea.

She floundered helplessly, unable to sink into hell or rise to the heavens. In the distance, she saw a silver fish. No, upon closer inspection, it wasn’t something that could be called a fish.

A shark.

The very giant shark she had only heard about through sailors’ tales, with its beautiful silvery-blue body and fierce teeth, turned to look at her. She was caught in the shark’s gaze.

I have to escape.

…But where to?

Livia frantically thrashed her limbs, but the more she did, the deeper she sank into the ocean.

“Only when their entire body is devoured, leaving only their eyes, does the host realize.”

The giant shark, the Megalodon, twisted its body powerfully, causing the sea to churn. The swirling currents seized her, and the predator of the sea charged at her fiercely.

“Ugh…!”

Triton’s hand moved past Livia’s flailing knees and reached her thigh. As he caressed the outside of her fleshy thigh, his hand gradually moved inward.

“That they are truly going to die….”

I’m going to die, that shark is going to eat me.

Livia struggled violently, trying to break free from Triton’s grasp.

No, I can’t die here. I have to save Lete.

“Ugh, huh…!”

“Livia.”

Triton’s voice seeped into Livia’s ears, as if it were gently sinking in. Could a siren’s voice, known for luring sailors, be this sweet? She shook her head vigorously to resist the enchantment, but the touch that alleviated her pain left her powerless.

“Come on, open your eyes. That’s the only way to escape the hallucination.”

Hallucination? Was the shark swimming vividly before her eyes just an illusion?

Was this fear that shook her soul truly fake?

Livia shook her head again. In response to her denial, Triton’s grip on her thigh tightened.

“Just how far did they bite you…?”

With a sigh, he forcefully parted Livia’s tightly closed legs. He traced the inside of her thigh, marked by the bug bites, with his fingertips.

“Ah…”

Livia flinched noticeably. Triton couldn’t miss that subtle reaction. After a moment of silence, he let out a quiet laugh.

“Aha.”

This is it, your weak spot.

As she felt the cold hand forcibly part her tightly closed thighs, a sudden clarity pierced through the confusion of hallucinations and echoes in her mind. Livia let out a suppressed groan and thought to herself.

What is this? Who’s touching me?

Livia panted and twisted her body, trying to escape the touch. Even with her eyes closed, she still saw the shark vividly, yet she couldn’t convince herself that the hand parting her legs was an illusion.

She wanted to see what was touching her thigh, but a part of her fiercely resisted the idea.

Don’t open your eyes. Why…? Why shouldn’t I?

While she searched for the reason, a cold fingertip brushed her skin through the thin fabric.



Startled, she gasped, and nearby, she heard a laugh. It was a cruel laugh, as if someone was enjoying her distress. Some wicked person was laughing.

As she twisted to escape from that wickedness, long, white fingers pushed aside Livia’s underwear and slipped inside. They traced down between her gently closed, plump skin like wings.

“Ah, no… ah!”

Her voice nearly escaped, but instinctively, she bit her lips to hold it back. However, as if sensing that fleeting reaction, the hand touching her paused.

I need to run away.

Even subconsciously, she knew it was time to flee. Amidst the dizziness, she twisted her body, trying to push away whatever was pinning her down with her feet and knees, but it wouldn’t budge. It felt like a rock was pressing down on her, suffocating her.

“Should I let go?”

Suddenly, a soft voice tempted her. Simultaneously, the hand that had paused began to gently rub between her closed skin, pressing her. Livia quickly nodded.

“Say, ‘Please let me go.'”

Just as her quivering lips were about to open on their own, Livia gritted her teeth.

Tsk, she heard a tongue click, and the soothing hand pinched and twisted her clitoris.

Startled, she gasped and jerked her hips upward, causing the pearl-like flesh to scrape against the man’s fingertips.

The hesitation in her mind vanished the moment Triton slapped her vulva with water cupped in his palm.

“Le-let go, let go, uh…!”

The one who got what he wanted let out a short laugh.

“Hiding your voice, hiding your eyes…. You’re hiding a lot. So, Livia….”

At that moment, the mocking voice grated on her nerves.

“What are you hiding in here?”

Long, thick fingers slid smoothly between her tightly closed flesh.

In that place, which couldn’t be described as wet, the intruder stirred the narrow passage slightly.



Livia’s eyes flew open at the pain, different from when she was bitten by the leech-like bug.

Her chapped lips parted in speechless shock. Through her contracted pupils, she saw a face smiling elegantly, contrasting with the rough and rude fingertips.

“Finally, it’s an honor to see your eyes.”

Ah…. They said the hallucinations would disappear if she opened her eyes, but that wasn’t true. In front of her was still a shark. A shark. More beautiful and fierce than any shark she had ever seen….

No, to be more precise, it was the god of the sea with the eyes of a shark.

Livia stared blankly at Triton with a pale, crumpled face, then slowly lowered her gaze. She wanted to see what was happening to her body.

A large hand attached to a long arm, marked with strange patterns, was delving between her legs. She couldn’t understand why his hand was between her thighs.

“Why, why….”

Her hand, belatedly regaining consciousness, grasped Triton’s shoulder. As she tried to push him away, digging her nails into him, his shoulder pressed even more firmly against her.

“What?”

Feigning innocence, he whispered as he twisted the fingers he had pushed inside her.

“This?”

Her tense body contracted, and she trembled between her legs. A type of pain she had never experienced before surged through her.

“Huh, ugh…!”

“If you can speak, you should say it, Livia. Tell me, what do you want me to stop doing?”

His voice was soft as he whispered while moving his fingers in the narrow opening. That softness only intensified Livia’s shame. His thumb scraped her clitoris, and his long, thick middle finger parted her inner flesh without hesitation.

Wherever his cool, damp fingertips brushed, heat flared up inside her.

It seemed impossible, yet she felt as if water was pooling between her legs. At some point, the hallucinations and echoes had vanished, but the situation unfolding made her wish for those hallucinations instead.

“It feels like that dirty bug has burrowed inside here….”

“No, no…. Ugh, huh!”

“Really? But there are bite marks here, under your pussy.”

How could he say such things….

When Livia stared at him in shock, her eyes wet with tears, he smiled nonchalantly and withdrew his fingers, then thrust them back into her vaginal entrance. A pained moan escaped from Livia’s lips.

“Why are you surprised? It’s just language, after all…. Or did you think there was a divine language just for referring to a pussy?”

“Take it out… take it out, hic! Huh…! Take it out…. Quickly…!”

“Why? You managed to endure a broken leg, eating rotten food, and letting leech bugs feast on your flesh, but you can’t endure this?”

Livia neither denied nor affirmed Triton’s words; she simply shook her head.

His hand moved in and out of her entrance, and as his palm brushed against her swollen clitoris, her body heated up and tingled against her will.

It was humiliating. Her body’s reaction, so different from her will, responded to the hands of the one mocking her.

“Humans…. Is this embarrassing for you, Livia?”

“Don’t, huff, call my name….”

“Livia, Livia. Livia….”

Ignoring her plea, Triton sang her name softly, as if to taunt her. Meanwhile, his hand continued to stroke her now swollen and sensitive area without pause.

Each time, it was like flint striking sparks, sending small jolts between her legs. The strange and uncomfortable pleasure rising within her shook her to the core. The hand gripping one of her thighs, trying to close, was rough. As her forcibly spread legs were exposed, the shame made her feel like her brain would explode.

“No, huh, eek…!”

“You should see how your pussy is constantly twitching.”

“Shut, up, ugh…!”

No one had ever touched between Livia’s legs before. Phedum had attempted something similar a few times but had always failed after being kicked by her.

It wasn’t that she was particularly attached to the idea of virginity, but from a young age, her father had told her that her body was precious. He had said not to let anyone touch her carelessly. If anyone tried to assult her, he had told her to kick them hard in the groin.

Following his advice, she had kicked many men in the groin, but gods were unaffected by her kicks, which was a problem.

“Hngh… ugh…!”

Every time she tried to suppress the pleasure, her toes curled. His hand, seemingly understanding what she responded to, became increasingly vigorous as it plunged deeper.

Did they say the god of the sea controlled the water? It felt as though Triton’s touch was forcibly drawing out the moisture from within Livia’s body. Otherwise, there was no reason for her to feel wet and experience tingling sensations in this situation, during this act.

This wasn’t right. She despised it. She loathed her body for trembling with pleasure she didn’t want to feel. In response, Livia grasped the golden dagger she had momentarily released.

“Stop it.”

Her breathless voice lacked strength. His indifferent gaze swept over her as she shuddered from his hand lifting and rubbing her dampened lower region. Even though he noticed her gripping the golden dagger tightly, he didn’t react. It was a clear mockery, as if to say, “What harm can you do to me in this state?”

“Fortunately, it seems no bugs have entered this narrow hole.”

“Ah, ah…!”

His fingers, which had somehow become two, spread and closed, violating her inner flesh. The words he spoke while swirling inside her shattered Livia’s last thread of reason.

Panting, she raised the dagger high. With eyes wet and red, she glared at Triton and then plunged it deeply into her own chest.



His face froze instantly, as if he hadn’t expected the dagger’s tip to be aimed at Livia herself.

The sensation was so exhilarating that even amidst the searing pain in her chest, Livia found herself oddly amused.

“What is this…?”

With a grimace, Triton grabbed Livia’s hand, which was clutching the dagger. In response, Livia urgently mouthed words.

“Triton…”

He paused for a moment. His reflection was visible in her slightly wavering blue eyes. Whatever emotions lay hidden within them were unclear, but it didn’t matter. This was her chance.

“I… you…”

Her small, trembling hand reached for Triton’s hand, which was holding the dagger’s tip. In a whisper-like, fragile voice, she spoke to the man looking at her with distorted eyes.

“I really hate you.”

In that moment of his distraction, Livia, with their hands still entwined, mustered all her strength to drive the dagger further in.

The chill of death crept up from her toes. Though the wound was in her chest, death seemed to be spreading from her extremities.

The sea god’s gaze grew fierce, his face shattered by mockery and arrogance. Not a bad way to die. Though there was disgrace, she had achieved her primary goal.

The corners of Livia’s lips twisted upward.

And with that, she took her second and final breath.



What on earth was this?

Triton, usually unfazed by most things, found himself letting out incredulous laughs while holding the woman who had just died her second death in his arms.

After barely surviving the leech-like worms, she ended up dying right before his eyes? And by stabbing herself in the chest, no less? Why, why would she do this?

Triton’s mouth twisted involuntarily. The pale complexion of the woman, now dead and disheveled beneath him, struck his eyes.

Blood from the gash in her chest, caused by the dagger, soaked Triton’s bed. She had stabbed herself so deeply that death was instantaneous. How could she bleed so much in just that brief pause?

Human life is so fragile. Just a dagger to the heart, and she died so easily. Yet, the flesh torn by those wretched leech worms had healed perfectly under Triton’s touch….

Ha.

Seeing her skin, flawless and without a trace of a scar, only fueled his anger.

She threatened to strangle, stab, and kill him, yet she dies from just a finger in her wound? He didn’t even thrust anything significant, just a mere finger.

He never expected her to escape this moment with such a stunt.

Then again, when did this human woman ever act as he anticipated?

Triton looked at the woman, now a corpse, with eyes filled with turbulent emotions.

“Triton.”

How dare she whisper his name, making him drop his guard, only to take her own life?

The moment he heard his name mixed with her fragile, wavering breath, a shiver like a tidal wave ran through his entire body.

Triton.

He had never attached much significance to his name, but the way she voiced it was different. It was as if something within it momentarily clouded his mind.

Was it Echidna’s cunning trickery, or a hidden talent of Livia Horn?

Her softly whispered voice was tickling, yet the only words she uttered were ‘I really hate you.’

A bitter laugh escaped him.

Just ‘hate’? Just ‘hate’!

A lifetime of hatred, a vow to seek revenge, a promise to tear someone apart—none of these. Just ‘I really hate you.’ It was so absurd that it almost felt charming.

You couldn’t just throw out such a charming remark and then escape like this, Livia.

Yet, on the other hand, it was still puzzling. A woman who had endured all sorts of trials would cut her own chest over such a taunt? Moreover, their trials were not yet over, and Livia’s revenge was incomplete.

Most importantly, there was the smile she wore when she stabbed herself.

Something about it definitely felt off.



Triton withdrew the water droplets he had used to contain Livia’s death.

Soon, black smoke that oxidized the soul spread, and before long, Hermes’ feather, which collected souls, floated down. The fluttering feather took the soul and disappeared into the underworld.

Triton quietly watched the scene from a step away.



The goddess Athena had said that Livia must die at Triton’s hands.

So, didn’t this death roughly align with her words? Whether it was a trick or a foul play, she had died in his hands, hadn’t she?

…No, had she really died?

Livia blinked her blurred eyes and sat up. Like darkness devouring light, she couldn’t see anything. Although her vision was blocked, she vaguely sensed she was in some vast, expansive place.

Where was this?

It was different from when Livia first arrived in the afterlife. There were no long queues of people walking, nor the distant river of death or the ferryman.

Just darkness…. A void, similar to the unconsciousness of deep sleep, pressed down on her. Suddenly, as she felt a chilling cold, a voice as icy as one that freezes souls reached her.

“You who disrupt the order of death.”

A shiver ran through her entire body.

Livia turned her stiff neck to find the source of the voice. Then she saw a massive leg, as if seated on a throne, surrounded by a halo of light that had not been visible before.

The upper body remained in shadow, revealing only the legs and garments, as if merely indicating its presence.

“You who have met death at the hands of a god. Yet, it is not your time to die. Your existence continually disrupts the order of the world of death.”

An overwhelming presence, as if it could crush with just its voice.

As soon as she realized who it was, her soul instinctively shrank back in fear.

The god of death, the king of the underworld, Hades.

She tried to resist the fear somehow, but it was a futile effort. The ash-colored eyes that appeared in the darkness easily overpowered her.

Her trembling legs gave way, and Livia found herself collapsing to the ground. A metallic sound came from her ankle. Glancing down, she saw the chain, a mark of one who attempted to harm a god, heavily attached to her ankle.

“Your mere presence here disrupts the order of death. Those who take death lightly also take life lightly.”

At that moment, a pillar of deathly flames rose around Livia. The searing heat, as if it would melt her skin, crushed her.

“Learn the fear of death until you return to life.”

Out of water, into fire….

Livia, gasping for breath, let out a hollow laugh. Perhaps due to Triton’s trials, she hadn’t completely lost her mind. Whether this was fortunate or not, it meant she could fully feel the pain.

“Ahhh!”

The infernal flames of hell melted Livia’s skin. The intense heat elicited a scream.

“Stop…. That’s enough, Hades.”

Suddenly, a voice as warm as spring sunlight intervened. The light that lingered near Hades’ legs spread, revealing another throne beside him. The toes of a pink goddess were visible beneath the flowing skirt.

Persephone, the queen of the underworld, was pleading with her husband.

“This girl is merely being used by fate…. If a human does not fear death, it means they are living a life more hellish than death. So don’t be too harsh, Aidoneus.”

The terrifying ruler of the underworld fell silent at his wife’s words. He neither opposed nor agreed, but the pillar of flames that threatened to melt Livia gradually subsided.

“‘That child’ came looking for that woman and came to me.”

At that moment, the lukewarm atmosphere completely changed.

The pillar of flames vanished instantly, and Hades turned slightly toward his wife on the throne.

“That child, to you?”

“Yes. Something might change. Perhaps, as you wish….”

Persephone’s words seemed to make Hades thoughtful. Meanwhile, Persephone reached out her hand toward Livia. A red light enveloped her, and in an instant, the skin that had been burned by hellfire healed completely. The pain, too, vanished as if it had never been.

Livia gazed at her restored skin with disbelief. Perhaps, she thought, she understood why humans were merely playthings to the gods.

They were creatures so insignificant that they could be killed or saved with just a snap of the fingers. Although they resembled the gods, humans were more desperate and sometimes displayed unimaginable abilities, making them fascinating to watch.

She felt she would never understand them, just as they would never understand her.

“…Maybe, even that was part of a plan from the beginning.”

The silent king muttered as if sighing. Livia sensed Hades’ gaze on her, and then he suddenly stood up.

“In that case, I leave the handling of this fearless human to you, Persephone.”

“Thank you, Hades.”

As Hades turned away, he looked back at Livia. Though she couldn’t see him, hidden in darkness, she felt his gaze.

“Perhaps, I might see you often.”

Before she could ask what he meant, the king withdrew. He walked into the pitch-black darkness and vanished without a trace, as if his enormous size was meaningless, without a sound. They said Hades was death itself.

That seemed true. Like death, which approached without warning and took breath away in an instant, the god of death’s steps were heavy and silent, yet possessed an unstoppable force.

In retrospect, the sea was the same. No human could stop the flooding sea. Just as resisting the raging waves was futile, humans were powerless against death.

Yet, while there were humans who succumbed to fear, Livia stood on the opposite side. Unbeknownst to herself, she discovered this rebellious nature through her trials with the sea god.

When given pain, she gritted her teeth and endured it, and when someone tried to control her by force, she would escape, even if it meant dying. Just as she had torn open her chest to escape those cold, clammy fingers that pierced through her….

Of course, she was also biding her time to die in his hands.

Suddenly recalling that moment made her head boil with heat. More than anything, reacting to the mocking hand was utterly humiliating. Perhaps that’s why the moment his arrogant smile twisted was all the more satisfying.

“Well then, shall we move to another place, Livia?”

Persephone’s touch on Livia’s back brought her out of her daze. Instantly, the scenery surrounding Livia changed.

When she opened her eyes, Livia found herself with Persephone on a windy hill.

Where was this place?

As she briefly turned her head to survey her surroundings, she heard a rumbling sound from the ground, and rocks began to rise. The rocks, changing shape at will, formed a flat, low table.

What in the world was happening?

With a puzzled expression, Livia looked at Persephone, who gestured for her to sit as she took a seat.

“Sit down, Livia. The tea is getting cold.”

Looking at the stone table, Livia saw that teacups and dessert plates had appeared. Amazingly, the plates were even set with ripe fruit.

Livia followed the queen’s gesture and sat down, but she didn’t touch the tea or the fruit plate offered to her.

“It’s not food from the underworld, so don’t worry and eat. When I’m down here, my mother often sends fruits from the surface. They’re very sweet and delicious.”

Instead of refusing, Livia asked a question.

“The ‘child’ you mentioned earlier, is it Zagreus by any chance?”

In response to Livia’s question, the queen silently smiled and held her teacup. Though she didn’t answer, Livia sensed affirmation in her silence. Who was that man, to make the two rulers of the underworld pay such attention?

What worried her even more was the fact that the man whom the king and queen of the underworld cared about had come looking for her.

“‘That ‘child’ came searching for that woman and ended up with me.”

She was curious about why that man sought her out and what his relationship with Persephone was. However, before Livia could ask, a question came from the other side.

“Why have you come here, Livia?”

The queen’s question was perplexing. She spoke as if she knew Livia had ‘intentionally’ died.

Upon reflection, since they were the ones who judged those heading to the paradise of Elysion and the deepest hell of Tartarus, they could easily see through matters related to Livia’s death.

“If you returned with a purpose, it must be… the usual purpose of humans entering the underworld.”



“Are you looking for someone?”

Unintentionally, Livia let her eyes reveal a flicker of emotion. As she lowered her head in embarrassment, Persephone chuckled softly.

“Those who come to the underworld alive usually have similar purposes. So, is it family?”

Persephone’s gaze seemed to see right through Livia.

If Triton’s eyes held the sea and waves, Persephone’s light green eyes resembled sunlight broken into fragments. But it wasn’t just warm sunlight; it was a pale light with the chilly undertone of early spring.

The queen met Livia’s eyes for a moment before slowly closing her own. Her throat vibrated softly as she suddenly whispered as if sighing.

“Your father was a flawless man. His wife waited for him at the entrance of Elysion for a long time. Even without memories, they recognized each other—a pure love. Hmm. It seems they will soon be reborn. On the same day, at the same time.”

Livia’s heart sank at the queen’s words.

It was about her father. The wife he had longed for all his life had been waiting for him here.

Ah, thank goodness. Knowing that death wasn’t entirely unfortunate for him brought her relief. Her tightly closed eyes grew warm with tears.

Hearing they would soon be reborn meant he had committed almost no sins before his death.

Of course. He was foolishly kind. He wouldn’t even kill a sheep unless absolutely necessary. Indeed, her father was such a good and virtuous man.

“Your brother… Oh, it seems he caught Charon’s favor. He’s very skilled at handling boats. He seems to have accepted Charon’s offer and will be a ferryman for a while. He’ll make a good ferryman. Oh dear, he’s already donned Charon’s cloak, so it’ll be hard to find him.”

Livia, covering her mouth with both hands, nodded with tears streaming down her face. Hearing about her family in such an unexpected way left her overwhelmed with emotion.

“Yes. Iason is good with boats. He’s also very good at making them. He has, he has very good hands. Really, really good….”

Unwittingly, she started babbling about such things. Persephone quietly paused and waited for Livia’s tearful voice to subside.

“And finally, your younger sibling….”

Livia snapped to attention at the queen’s voice. The reason she had come here was to hear about Lete.

“Oh dear, how unfortunate. The soul has vanished. It’s rare, but not unheard of. Either it lost its way or perhaps…”

“Or…?”

“Someone stole it.”



Livia had hoped it wasn’t true.

As she listened to the stories about her father and Iason, she held onto a faint hope that Lete was safely preparing for the next life after death…

But it seemed the witch’s words were true. That witch had indeed stolen her younger sibling’s soul and trapped it in that cold, dark place.

“Please help me.”

It was frustrating that this was all she could say.

Even in despair, she felt a sense of gratitude. There were countless unjust deaths in the world, and everyone cried out to the gods for help. But not everyone had the chance to plead directly in the presence of a deity.

So, Livia was willing to choose the path of humiliation if it meant she could receive help from the ruler of the underworld…!

“Please, help me just this once.”

Livia knelt before the queen, pressing her forehead to the ground. She silently watched her.

“If you wish, I will die and serve as your eternal servant. Command me, and I will do my utmost to fulfill it. So, please. Please…!”

She pleaded desperately, banging her forehead on the floor. Persephone clicked her tongue softly and gently touched Livia’s forehead with her hand.

“This won’t do any good, Livia. I can’t act on personal matters without reason. However, I can give you some time.”

As she spoke, light flowed from Persephone’s hand, revealing a rough hourglass with a pomegranate design.

“Before the sand runs out, search the underworld as much as you like. It’s not a lot of time, but I’ll provide you with an assistant.”

“…An assistant?”

Persephone nodded and smiled as she stood up. Somewhere, the sound of a crow echoed. Looking up at the sky, Persephone’s expression turned slightly chilly.

“I must go now.”

“Wait, please. Who is this assistant you’re talking about…?”

“They’ll come if you wait. Good luck, Kore.”

She brushed off her seat and turned away coldly, as if she had no regrets. Her actions were undoubtedly kind, yet there was an inexplicable chill about them.

It felt like kindness with a purpose.

That chill made her watch Persephone’s retreating figure without daring to stop her.

Livia had the eerie feeling that if she carelessly offended her, she would suddenly transform into a terrifying figure, as if all her kindness had been an illusion.

As she stared despairingly in the direction Persephone had disappeared, she heard the rustling of wings and sensed someone behind her. Turning quickly, her expression froze.

Zagreus…?

It seemed he recognized her as well. Unlike the day in the forest, he was clad in black armor, and his stern face, matching his armor, changed the moment he saw Livia.

Sunlight broke over his somewhat gloomy and dark complexion. Her reflection appeared in his wide, dark eyes.

He approached with long strides and immediately cupped her cheeks with both hands, whispering softly.

“Found you.”



A black shark circling around the golden castle spotted another black shark returning from afar and vigorously swam forward, thrashing its tail.

A black shark sped towards the white shark at several tens of kilometers per hour and bit its fin. Although the white shark shook its body in annoyance at the black shark’s persistent nibbling, the black shark held on.

With no other choice, the white shark, Neo, headed towards Triton’s abode with the black shark still clinging to one of its fins.

“Neo, did you find something?” Triton asked as he scratched near the white shark’s belly. The shark then pulled something out of its mouth. At first glance, it looked like the tentacle of an octopus or squid, but it was actually the tail of a black snake.

“You lost the body and only brought back the tail, huh?” Triton remarked.

The white shark bared its teeth, recalling the tiresome and frustrating chase with the black snake. For a usually calm shark to be so irritated, it must have been quite an exasperating pursuit.

Triton, still rubbing the shark’s head in appreciation, shouted without turning around, “Don’t touch her, Sympho.”

Sympho, who had been about to bite Livia, lying on Triton’s bed, froze with his mouth wide open. The black shark, eyeing the situation, reluctantly smacked its lips in disappointment and circled around Livia, unable to let go of its interest.

“You really seem to like that human woman,” Triton said, turning around with a soft chuckle.

Sympho’s playful behavior was a sign of affection. After a few playful nibbles, he seemed to realize that the human woman was much sturdier than he had anticipated and had marked her as his playmate.

Despite its growing size, Sympho was still a young shark, full of mischief. Unlike its always calm sister, the white shark, Sympho had a very different personality, even though they were born from the same womb.

“It’s chaotic here. Go outside,” Triton said, waving his hand dismissively, annoyed by the two creatures circling around. He then fiddled with the black snake’s tail that the white shark had brought back and placed a chair beside Livia to watch over her.

Recently, his hobby had become watching the woman who lay in the sleep of death.

A corpse that was dead but not decaying… the implication was clear.

As he had anticipated, this woman’s soul would not remain in the underworld but would return here.

Triton approached Livia and lifted her wrist. On the inside of her faintly warm forearm was a small pomegranate emblem.

‘Persephone’s emblem.’

For a mere human to inscribe something like this so fearlessly…

Persephone was the goddess who heralded spring, but she was also the queen of the underworld. She possessed the patience and strength to endure until she could sprout what she desired from beneath the earth.

In other words, she was a woman who could endure the darkness to achieve what she wanted. In a way, Livia shared a similar trait. She was willing to do anything for what she desired.

Triton found himself somewhat impressed. For a mere human to dare to attack a god and obtain an emblem from the queen of the underworld… how many had achieved such feats?

“…Shouldn’t this woman be the one to carry the epic of a hero?” he mused.

He had to admit, her courage was commendable.

If this woman had become a warrior, she would have been an extraordinary one. When you think about it, challenging gods, resisting, and undergoing trials were similar, yet some were heroes and others villains.

Considering that most of the latter were women, it crossed his mind that Livia Horn might be known as the villainess Livia in future generations.

Villainess Livia.

The combination of those words wasn’t bad. Triton’s lips curled into a lazy smile as he recalled the green eyes that had glared at him, wet and defiant.

She might not have been an extraordinary beauty, but those eyes alone could captivate many. Clear, firm, and truly warm-looking green.

His cool fingertips touched the eyelids of the sleeping woman. Though the gesture was light, his touch lingered.

Echidna, where did you find something like this?

It was truly intriguing.

Thinking it was Echidna’s doing should have been displeasing, yet he couldn’t feel that way at all.

Perhaps it was because this woman had been sent to his side with that intention in mind, which made it all the more fascinating. Even knowing it was bothersome, he didn’t feel the urge to send her away.

How did you end up in Echidna’s grasp? If only I had gotten hold of you first…

He recalled the woman’s words about exchanging revenge with Echidna. It’s a shame—she won’t be able to achieve that…

About 30 days of the 100 days promised to Livia had passed. During that time, this woman had already died twice and nearly died three times.

Yet, she somehow kept returning to him like a boomerang. Of course, she came back with gritted teeth, vowing to plunge a dagger into his heart, but it was quite refreshing.

Is she truly capable of enduring anything for her goal? Her relentless determination and patience, like a flint enduring long to ignite a fire, were intriguing.

Livia Horn.

How far can you endure? Or rather, how far will you fail to endure?

Triton had to admit it. He was becoming increasingly curious about this human woman. As intrigued as he was, he wanted to keep her within his grasp and toy with her a little more.


So far, whether through cunning or sheer luck, she had managed to survive, but eventually, she would die. After all, she was human. Humans are born to live absurdly short lives and then pass away, as is their natural fate.

Just as sand is swept away by waves only to be replaced by more sand, humans die and are born again, replacing one another.

This woman, struggling to endure, was no exception. Someday, she would succumb to death, like any mortal, and drift away like the ever-flowing waves.

Therefore, there was no need to attach meaning to a fleeting life that would eventually vanish. If his life was an endless spool of thread, she was merely a speck of dust on it.

He would toy with her and then brush her aside. Triton gently caressed the pale woman’s cheek. Beneath her cold skin, he felt a faint warmth.

She will return soon.

With this realization, the corners of his mouth relaxed. He settled comfortably and closed his eyes to rest. Or at least, he tried to.



When Triton opened his eyes, irritation flickered in them.

Someone had poured liquor into the sea. And not just any liquor, but very strong wine.

As he sighed and rose from his seat, he heard a commotion beneath the window. Moving to the window, he saw the source of the wine and noise making a boisterous entrance.

Sensing his gaze, the person quickly looked up, spotted Triton, and waved.

“I heard something interesting sank to the bottom of the sea, so I came to take a look!”

Dionysus shouted loudly, waving a staff wrapped in grapevines. Triton’s head began to ache as if he were already feeling the hangover. Detecting the intruder, Triton gave a curt order to Sympho and Neo, who had returned to his side, to throw out the drunkard.

“Get him.”

As if waiting for those words, Sympho grinned, baring hundreds of teeth, and charged forward.



…Livia never knew there was so much to eat in the underworld.

She gazed at the feast laid out before her in amazement, tinged with a hint of sarcasm. The mysterious roasted meat, glossy black fruits, and wine with a slightly fishy aroma—all looked delicious but were things she ‘shouldn’t’ eat.

“Go ahead, eat. Hurry.”

Yet, someone was urging her to take a fork and dig in. Instead of accepting the fork thrust into her hand, Livia calmly set it down and looked at Zagreus. His face was familiar, like meeting an old friend, but his eyes seemed strangely unfamiliar.

“No, thanks. If I eat the food of the underworld, I’ll be trapped here.”

At her words, the man paused, then gazed at her with eyes dark as night. His expression, when not smiling, appeared intensely cold. As if aware of this, he suddenly smiled. His eyes were chilling, but his smile was innocent.

“Why are you suddenly being so formal? You didn’t talk like that before.”

Triton had once taken her voice for speaking too informally. Judging by his twisted nature, this man’s eyes were equally unpredictable, and who knew what he might do if provoked. So, it was wise to be cautious.

“Speak like you did before. I don’t like this tone. I hate it.”

But he said he didn’t like it.

‘…One complains when I speak informally, another complains when I’m too formal.’

Swallowing a sigh, Livia continued.

“Okay, I’ll speak casually. I’m not eating the food. If I do, I’ll be stuck in the underworld.”

“Yeah, so what?”

His absurd response made her frown, and she retorted sharply.

“I don’t want to be in the underworld.”

“Why? The underworld isn’t such a bad place. I’ll take good care of you.”

Hearing such words from the man who had tried to kill her the first time they met felt rather absurd to Livia. Besides, whether he treated her well or not was of little importance to her.

“Why rush to a place you’ll end up in eventually when you die? I still have things to do up there.”

“Things to do? What are they?”

He slyly speared a piece of meat with a fork and brought it to Livia’s lips. Almost tempted by the delicious aroma, she pushed his hand away irritably and said, “I have things to do. I told you I don’t want to eat. Stop it.”

“What is it? Tell me what it is, and I won’t bother you.”

This time, he pressed something that looked like a grape but was darker and longer to her lips. He seemed determined to keep pestering her unless she told him. With a sigh, Livia pushed his hand away and spoke briefly.

“…Revenge.”

“Revenge?”

“Yes. I’m going to find those who killed my family and make them suffer the same way.”

At her words, a golden flash crossed Zagreus’s eyes. He lowered his gaze for a moment, then smiled as if satisfied, and added,

“If it’s something like that, you must do it. I’ll help you. Who do you want to kill? Just tell me their names and where they live.”

From his words, Livia gleaned a few things about him. He seemed quite pleased at the mention of revenge, and there was an underlying excitement and arrogance.

What kind of god was he? Perhaps he was even more terrifying than she had imagined. His voice, which sounded innocent, carried a chilling scent of Blood.

Livia observed him for a moment before shaking her head.

“No, it’s something I need to do myself. Besides, I’ve already joined forces with someone for my revenge.”

“Who?”

Another question. The questions seemed endless. Whether he was simply curious or wanted to know more about her, she wasn’t pleased. The sands in the hourglass were falling faster.

“Can’t you stop asking questions? Why do you keep asking?”

His eyes curved into a smile as he whispered,

“Because I’m interested in you.”

Livia was taken aback by the unexpected answer.

“Ever since I lost you, I’ve been thinking about you constantly.”

A cold hand cupped her cheek. The chill made her flinch instinctively.

“Where should I go to meet you again…”

Despite her wary gaze, Zagreus held her cheeks in both hands.

“What should I do to have you back again?”

“…That’s a strange thing to say. I was never yours, so how could you have lost me?”

“No. You were mine. Everything I hunt is mine by default.”

It was excessive interest, a peculiar obsession. Livia frowned and retorted,

“Your hunt failed. I eventually returned.”

Zagreus smiled silently at her words. The smile on his pale face beneath his dark hair was eerily beautiful. Like the lavish feast laid out before her, she knew that taking even a single bite would trap her.

Moreover, this was the same person who had pierced her shoulder with a large arrow and toyed with her physically. She had no desire to become entangled with him.

“Anyway… I don’t have much time right now. I have to go.”

“Go? Where?”

As Livia stood up, her wrist was caught. She recalled Persephone’s words. Persephone had said that a helper would come, and Zagreus had appeared right after.

If that’s the case…

“Lady Persephone said a helper would come to assist me. And then you showed up… Are you the helper she mentioned?”

He paused for a moment, as if deep in thought, then nodded with a brightened expression.

“She called me here, and when I responded, I found you. So, I suppose I am the one.”

“In that case, you need to help me. Why are you just sitting there? Get up quickly. We don’t have much time.”

Having received the answer she was looking for, Livia urged him to stand, sounding frustrated. His large frame rose as she pulled him up. His eyes, as he nodded at her, even seemed a bit excited.

“What do you need me to help with?”

“Someone took my deceased sibling. They must be somewhere in the underworld, but I don’t know where.”

“Do you know who took them?”

“Yes. It’s the witch I made a contract with. She’s trying to threaten me.”

“A witch?”

“We agreed that if I fulfilled what the witch wanted, she would grant me what I wanted. And… it was the witch who saved me when I almost died.”

As Livia explained, a low sigh escaped from Zagreus’s lips.

“Then, if it hadn’t been for that witch, I might have met you sooner.”

“If that were true, we might never have crossed paths. And you’re probably interested in me because I came to the underworld alive, right? If I had arrived here dead, I’d just be another ordinary soul.”

“Would that be so? No, I would have recognized you anyway.”

The man spoke with conviction. It was unclear why he felt so certain, but in a situation where every second mattered, it didn’t really concern her.

“Anyway, I need to find my sibling’s soul right now. There’s no time.”

Feeling increasingly anxious, Livia urged Zagreus. He glanced at the hourglass in Livia’s hand, thought for a moment, and then asked.

“Is there no way to break the contract with the witch?”

Livia shook her head with a somber expression.

“It’s impossible. As long as my sibling’s soul is held by her… Of course, I intend to fulfill my contract with her. She saved my life and promised to give me the perfect power to take revenge on the villagers. But… I can’t stand my sibling being held like that until then.”

Looking back, the contract that allowed a witch to help humans slaughter each other when they challenged the gods didn’t seem fair.

But at the time, Echidna was the best option for Livia, and the only power that offered to help her. So she intended to do her best until the end. That was until she learned Lete was captured.

‘…But what if I fail to split Triton’s heart?’

What would happen to Lete’s soul then?

Would the witch willingly return Lete’s soul to its rightful place? No, from the moment the soul strayed off its path, wasn’t Lete already deteriorating?

Thinking about it was unbearable. So the most important thing was to rescue Lete immediately. Whatever tricks the witch might play afterward, saving Lete was the top priority.

“Alright. I’ll help you. Let’s start by searching places where a soul might be hidden.”

Zagreus gently lifted Livia’s trembling hand and kissed the back of it softly. Smiling at her, he took a step back.

At that moment, when something felt strange, Zagreus’s body began to change. Before long, a large black panther stood in front of Livia.

Livia’s eyes widened in surprise. The panther, with its sleek black fur and golden eyes, was more beautiful than frightening. It leaned its graceful back towards her, looking up at Livia.

“Come on, climb on.”

Honestly, Livia preferred animals over people, so she liked Zagreus in his animal form much more than in his human form. It made her feel less guarded.

“You can transform…?”

“When necessary.”

Just as she thought she had never seen such a large animal before, she remembered the sharks that always swam together like twins.

Well, sharks were animals too, even if they were fish….

By that logic, she had also encountered a huge man with a fish tail. Though he wasn’t an animal….

Come to think of it, that man seemed capable of transforming as well. Could he change into other forms? Perhaps into a small fish? If so, maybe that chillingly beautiful form could become a bit more human.

Livia tried to imagine a small fish with Triton’s blue eyes. But she couldn’t picture it at all. That man could never be a small fish. Maybe a young shark, at most.

Shaking off thoughts about the sea creatures, Livia approached Zagreus with a face flushed with anticipation. The panther’s eyes paused on her rosy cheeks, and it licked its lips. Its long, sleek tail swayed gently.

With careful movements, Livia climbed onto Zagreus’s back. As her perspective suddenly rose, the wind brushed against her cheeks. To avoid falling, Livia had to cling tightly to Zagreus’s neck. A low purr of contentment reached her ears.

“Where, where are we going?”

“I’m going to check the caves I know of first. Hold on tighter, Livia. I’m going to run faster.”

As he said this, the beast picked up speed. Livia had to cling tightly to its neck and close her eyes to avoid being overwhelmed.

Soon, they arrived at a secluded cave. Sharp black stalactites hung from above, and stalagmites rose from the ground, resembling the mouth of a monster. The strong smell of sulfur wafting from deep within made Livia wrinkle her nose.

“It’s dangerous, so stay here. I’ll go in and take a look.”

Zagreus set her down and dashed into the cave like the wind. He returned shortly after, but he was alone. Without delay, he lifted her onto his back and headed to another location.

Livia was impressed by his swift movements, yet she felt a sense of despair thinking about how she would have searched this vast underworld without him. What was even more disheartening was that they hadn’t found Lete by the time the sand in the hourglass was nearly gone.

“I’m sorry.”

When only a few grains of sand remained, Zagreus, drenched in sweat, apologized.

Livia was frustrated but knew it wasn’t Zagreus’s fault. In fact, she was grateful that he had taken it upon himself to help her so earnestly, despite everything he had done to her before. She could almost forgive him for pushing her to the brink of death and mocking her body.

“No, it’s not your fault.”

Livia watched anxiously as the grains of sand fell. Zagreus, having returned to his original form, stood in front of her. He placed his hand over hers, which held the hourglass, and spoke.

“I will find your sibling for you.”



“But in return, Livia.”

He gently lifted her chin, making her look at him. In his dark eyes, she saw a fierce lightning strike. It was always fascinating to see the eyes of gods, but she knew if she got lost in them, she’d be completely entranced.

“When I find your sibling, give me a kiss.”

“…What?”

Startled, she widened her eyes, and he lowered his voice, softening his gaze.

“That’s all I want.”

Livia was bewildered. When she first met Zagreus, he had the eyes of a predator. Those cold eyes seemed to be deciding whether to kill her now or later. But then, his gaze changed, and he seemed to want to lick and suck her in.

When they met again, he was entirely different. Though his eyes still held a predatory hunger, he now pretended to be a prey, softening his gaze.

But no matter how much a predator pretended to be prey, a predator was still a predator. Just like a wolf pretending to be a lamb was still a wolf. What puzzled Livia was why this wolf was wagging its tail at her.

“Well, it’s because I’m interested in you.”

…Really, just for that?

It was surprising to think that even this god of death had such a tender, human-like heart. On the other hand, she felt fortunate to have someone willing to search the entire underworld for her because of that heart.

Once she left the underworld this time, she didn’t know when she would be able to return. Perhaps next time, she would be completely shattered by Triton’s trial. If that happened, she would come to the underworld, but the deal with the witch would be broken, and Echidna might destroy her sibling’s soul. So she had to find her sibling before that.

For that, she was willing to kiss death.

“…Alright. But make sure you save my sibling.”

At her response, he smiled broadly.

“I promise. Absolutely.”

At that moment, Livia’s soul was forcefully pulled somewhere.



Livia regained consciousness in the darkness.

The deep sea is a place where darkness is more prevalent than light. So when Livia first opened her eyes, she thought she was still in the underworld. She was conscious, but her body felt incredibly heavy. On top of that, she was so exhausted that she couldn’t fully regain her senses.

‘Where am I this time? What could be waiting for me…’

Just thinking about it made her feel even more fatigued. It was strange, though. She didn’t feel tired. She felt like she was still okay…

Yet her body seemed to disagree, sinking endlessly downward. Livia forced her heavy eyelids open to look around. It felt like ages since she had regained consciousness, yet her mind was still foggy. Her dim vision slowly brightened, and she noticed small jellyfish floating around the bed before she realized where she was.

The ocean.

Only then did she feel the moisture filling her nostrils. She knew she needed to get up now that she was awake, but her eyes kept closing.

The bed, gently swaying, seemed to absorb her, and the lukewarm temperature felt like it was melting her away. Her entire body felt like it was lazily flowing away.

Familiar sights from the room briefly came into view. Livia blinked her eyes, trying to clear her vision, and frowned.

Could it be Triton’s chamber…?

However, there was no way the ill-tempered king of the sea would have laid her down to sleep in his own bed. The coral and pearl strands around the jellyfish were extravagantly beautiful, but it wasn’t unusual for the castle to have a few lavish rooms.

Livia decided to feign ignorance and closed her eyes again. Since she had just woken up, she wanted to sleep a little longer.

It was only when she heard shouting from outside that her mind became clear.



“Crazy Dionysus!”

Someone shouted loudly, startling the nymphs who were busy cleaning and causing them to rush over to her.

“Shh, Letis. Shh! What if someone hears you?”

“I want them to hear! How many days has it been now? The whole sea reeks of alcohol because of those drunkards!”

“Still, thanks to them, we’ve had plenty of wine to drink and enjoyed watching the festival.”

Dionysus had been at the sea for six days, which meant the wild drinking party had been going on for six days already.

The feast was so chaotic and filthy that those who weren’t drunk felt their eyes were being assaulted just by looking at it. That’s probably why there was an unspoken rule that only the intoxicated could attend the feast.

The only saving grace was that once the wild and dirty feast ended, everyone seemed to forget what happened as if waking from a spell.

Of course, the remnants of the feast remained, leaving the nymphs with the tedious task of cleaning up every morning. Thankfully, creatures like bugs and shrimp that fed on the leftovers helped clean up the mess, sparing the nymphs from the most unpleasant chores.

“At least it ends tomorrow. Anyone who wants to can attend the last day’s feast,” Audike said, trying to be comforting as she cleared away broken dishes, causing some of the nymphs to giggle with excitement. The more relaxed atmosphere was quickly shattered by Letis, who had been shouting earlier.

“Are you crazy? You’re not actually thinking of going, are you? You’re not Maenads, and you want to go to such a filthy, chaotic place?”

Letis’s eyes were filled with disdain. Born between a minor sea god and a sea nymph, Letis had a strong sense of pride in her divine lineage. Her loud voice and strong opinions often intimidated those around her.

“How vulgar. Can you really call yourselves nymphs serving Triton? Get a grip.”

Even when saying the same thing, Letis had a knack for making it sound unpleasant, and her words darkened the faces of the surrounding nymphs.

“Lord Triton said we could go if we wanted. And what, should sea nymphs be more noble? That’s hilarious.”

“Of course! Nymphs are supposed to be pure! Sea nymphs should serve the sea, just like forest nymphs serve the forest. Besides, unlike other promiscuous gods, Lord Triton is a faithful god who remains with only one partner. Do you want to become debauched while serving such a lord?”

“Oh, really? You think attending one feast will make us debauched and dirty? And you do know there’s another woman lying in Lord Triton’s quarters, right? A hu-man wo-man.”

At that moment, fire sparked in Letis’s red eyes.

“Are you insane? Nanai! Go wash that filthy mouth of yours right now! How can you put that vile human woman who threw herself into the sea with impure intentions on the same level as Lord Triton? Unbelievable! Lord Triton only has Lady Selene!”

“Isn’t it well-known? There have been many gods who kept humans by their side, charmed by their beauty. There’s no rule saying Lord Triton can’t do the same.”

“Oh my, have you lost your mind? Where did you hear such disgusting stories? And are your eyes rotten? Where’s the beauty in that human? You’ve insulted Lord Triton. Apologize. Apologize now!”

“Ridiculous! Apologize? To whom? Lord Triton? No, he didn’t hear this. Surely, not you?”

“Yes! You made my ears rot, so apologize to me. Right now!”

“You apologize first!”

Eventually, a fight broke out among the nymphs who were cleaning the dirty banquet hall.

“Oh, girls! Stop it! Don’t fight!”

“Stay out of it, Audike!”

Audike hurriedly tried to stop her companions, but she was overpowered and ended up falling backward.

“Ah! Did you just grab my hair?”

“Yeah, I did! So what!”

Whenever Letis was involved, a fight broke out at least one out of every three times. Audike, who had tried to intervene several times, eventually gave up and stepped back.

Whether they fought or not, she focused on tidying up the area assigned to her. However, the two were still fighting even after she finished her work.

‘Ugh, they’re like lunatics.’

Audike clicked her tongue in exasperation and quickly stepped outside. It was about time to stop them, but she couldn’t do it alone. She went to find the chief administrator in the main palace to report the fight.

“What? They’re at it again? Ugh, I’m so busy I could die!”

Chief Administrator Nephea quickly grabbed a thick broom and rushed to the conch palace banquet hall where the fight had broken out. Fortunately, the conch palace, which had been used as a banquet hall the previous night, was right next to the main palace.

With her unexpected free time, Audike thought about the human woman who had caused the fight.

Livia… that was definitely her name.

The human woman had been the center of attention since the moment she was captured.

In this grand and splendid palace where everything existed except for a single human, it had finally arrived. It was impossible not to be excited.

“A human snuck into the banquet!”

“They say the banquet was turned upside down because of that human!”

“Do you know what’s even more shocking? That human has Chrysaor’s golden dagger!”

“And she tried to attack Lord Triton with that dagger!”

“What?”

Some said the golden dagger had pierced Triton’s heart, while others claimed she hadn’t even gotten close before dropping the dagger.

Whatever the case, it seemed to be true that a human had brandished a dagger at a god.

“Wow! Is she brave or just out of her mind?”

“To think of attacking a god… is she foolish or impressive?”

No one believed their god had been hurt or received a fatal blow. Even if they were reborn several times, such a thing would never happen.

Gods were immortal beings.

Even if gods fought each other, they would only be sealed away, not destroyed. The worst outcome was merely being forgotten, but even then, they were simply replaced by the next generation of gods. They never truly disappeared. This was only natural.

Gods were the world itself.

They were the earth, the mountains, the rivers, the wind, the thunder, and the sun.

If there were no land, what would they stand on? Similarly, if it never rained and rivers didn’t flow, what would they drink?

For a god to die would mean the disappearance of the power they governed in this world. Just imagining a world without courage or beauty was terrifying.

The immortality of gods was for that reason, and for that reason, those who worshipped gods never worried about their deity’s safety.

The nymphs were just curious about that human, who seemed half-crazy with courage.

Could she be a half-Blood offspring of some god, like Heracles or Achilles? Since she had a golden dagger, was she perhaps Chrysaor’s hidden daughter?

However, there was an even more astonishing story than the identity of the human who attacked a god.

‘Did Lord Triton really bring that human woman back alive?’

Rumor had it that the ‘God of the Sea’ had not only spared a human but also brought back the very one who had attacked him to the main palace.

‘Why? How? What on earth happened? That doesn’t make any sense!’

It was an unimaginable event. Wasn’t he the one who typically regarded humans as nothing more than filthy scum? Sure, there were times when he was in a good mood and allowed a trespassing ship to leave unharmed. But bringing someone to the palace was an entirely different matter.

Thus, those who worshipped Eros and had vivid imaginations began to whisper among themselves.

They speculated that perhaps the human woman was extraordinarily beautiful, and that Lord Triton had fallen for her at first sight.

There were countless stories of gods falling for stunning beauties. It seemed plausible enough, and they allowed their imaginations to run wild.

The whispers grew louder as they pondered how beautiful she must be for someone who had been indifferent even to the lovely Selene to fall for her at first sight. And when their master personally procured food that humans eat, those subtle rumors turned into certainty.


How many nymphs had wanted to serve at the meal just to catch a glimpse of that human woman? Among them, of course, was Letis, a devoted follower of Triton.

“Hmph! I knew it! She was hideously ugly!”

Letis proclaimed this as soon as she returned from serving, addressing the other curious nymphs. The nymphs who had carried the dishes with her frowned, but she remained adamant.

“Not just ugly, but she had a terribly vile and mean look! Her hair was all frizzy, like it had been singed by the sun. So, don’t even think about pairing such an ugly human with Lord Triton in your minds. That would be blasphemy!”

In truth, Livia wasn’t ugly at all. In fact, she was quite pretty, with green irises encircled by a subtle golden hue that gave her eyes a mysterious look.

She might not have been a beauty to rival the gods, but she certainly didn’t deserve labels like “hideously ugly” or “terribly vile.”

“Stop making things up, Letis. She’s not someone who deserves that kind of talk. And what does her appearance have to do with you anyway?”

Audike found herself retorting in anger. That day, she ended up having a big argument with Letis.

Dealing with Letis was always exhausting. She was good at her job but too interested in the affairs of those above her.

Recalling that day, Audike shook her head and suddenly felt a gaze upon her. She looked around, sensing someone watching her, and on a whim, glanced upwards.



Underneath a cascade of red hair, she locked eyes with those clear green pupils. The sunlit green eyes seemed to be intensely watching Audike, as if they were wanting to speak. Startled, the blue-haired nymph hesitated, then quickly turned away.

She fled from the spot as fast as she could.



Audike.

She was the nymph who had helped Livia when she first arrived at the Golden Castle. Or more accurately, the one Livia had used.



It had been bothering her for a while. If they ever met again, she wanted to apologize at least once.

She had taken advantage of Audike’s kindness and ended up causing her trouble. With a small sigh of regret, she noticed a pair of dots, one white and one black, approaching from a distance. Triton’s sharks.

Oh, those blasted black sharks.

Livia quickly hid behind a pillar. The sea castle had no windows, so there was no way to stop them from coming inside. And there was another issue.

Where on earth were her clothes?

Being completely unclothed, she couldn’t just run outside. The only silver lining was that with her clothes gone, she could see the spot on her chest where she had stabbed herself with the dagger.

Livia looked down at her body. The skin near her heart was smooth, without a scar. It was as if someone had healed it.



The memory of Triton’s face flashed in her mind just before she died, leaving her with a slightly strange feeling, but she quickly shook it off. She pulled out the golden dagger and tore a curtain-like fabric hanging by the window.

It was fortunate there were curtains in a place where sunlight didn’t reach. She wrapped it around herself, tied it into a short chiton, and quickly ran to the window in the opposite direction.

Just as she jumped out of the window.



There was a loud splash, and a huge mouth scooped her up.



Above the surface, the sunlight sparkled brilliantly.

The waves were calm, and the splashes from the leaping fish shimmered like jewels outside the water before disappearing. Amidst this, the sobbing cries of pirates, sprawled with twisted limbs and sinking into the sea, tainted the tranquility.

“Please, spare me. I beg you, please…! Ugh!”

“I was wrong, I was wrong! Please… Ahhh!”

“Aaah! Please…!!!”

Triton sat with his legs crossed on a chair made of sea foam, listening with bored eyes to the despairing cries of the humans. He had heard these pleas so many times that he could recite them by heart.

It was tedious, incredibly tedious. The most frustrating part was that even after being punished, they would make the same mistakes again.

Dugong, who had been searching inside the pirate’s ship, burst through the door with a fierce expression. In his arms was a very small, bloodied creature.

“Damn it! It’s already dried up and dead. The only survivor is this baby. They kept it alive, claiming young ones are precious.”

His words, delivered with a snort, were laced with anger.

“Please, spare me! Spare me, please!”

“If you let me live, I’ll be good. Have mercy…!”

Sensing the impending tragedy, the pirates lay prostrate on the ground, begging for their lives and admitting their wrongs.

Triton’s brow furrowed at the sickening pleas that polluted his ears.

A few months ago, over a hundred sirens living in hiding on the eastern Equis Archipelago had disappeared. Upon investigation, it was discovered that rumors had spread claiming that eating a siren’s heart could extend one’s life, leading all sorts of people to hunt them down.

A hundred years ago, there were rumors that eating a mermaid’s tail could cure diseases, and before that, drinking the Blood of sea nymphs was said to grant immortality and eternal youth. Now it was the sirens’ turn.

Those on land seemed to think there was some miraculous fountain of immortality beneath the sea, constantly seeking the secret to eternal life from the ocean.

“How foolish.”

Muttering softly, Triton extended his hand, and a water arrow shot out, piercing the head of the loudest pleading pirate.

“If you knew it was wrong, you shouldn’t have done it… I guess you wore your head as decoration? Oh, now that it’s gone, it’s even more useless. Might as well use it as Kraken food.”

As he spoke with a chuckle, an octopus tentacle that had quietly appeared dragged the headless corpse into the sea.

The other pirates, witnessing this, began to scream. To reduce the noise, he shot water arrows into their mouths one by one. The Kraken, expecting a feast below the ship, embraced the pirate ship.

With a crunch, the massive ship shattered in an instant. The ship tilted, and a few humans who hadn’t yet been executed scrambled frantically toward the side that hadn’t tilted.

It was always the same scene: commit a crime, receive punishment, and wail. Even after a hundred or a thousand years, the foolishness remained unchanged… By now, those desperate tears, repentance, and lamentations had little effect on him. After all, they would repeat the same actions.

It was unbearably tedious. Just as the suffocating cynicism was about to choke him, bubbles rose from the sea, and a massive black shark leaped out.

His shark, Sympho, rushed toward him immediately. And in its sharp teeth, it carried something “not boring.”

“What is it, Sympho? Why did you bring that?”

As Triton frowned and asked, a small body squirmed and suddenly moved as if to spring out.

“You Damn shark…!”

The woman, who seemed to have fainted for a moment, shook her head while clutching her forehead and then noticed the teeth still holding her. She quickly lunged forward. Her small hands desperately tried to pry open the sharp, hard teeth.

“One day, I’m definitely going to make shark steaks out of you! I mean it! I really do, ugh…!”

Her voice, gritting her teeth, was filled with frustration. Sympho, seemingly pleased that Livia had woken up, shook its head from side to side, welcoming her. With a cry, the woman tossed about, reached out and managed to hit the shark’s eyes.

The shark, unable to blink, was startled and opened its mouth, allowing her to escape through the loosened gap.

Hahaha!

Livia tried to laugh triumphantly, but someone else laughed first.

Startled, Livia turned around. Her pupils dilated in surprise, and silvery-blue hair shimmered like fish scales over her expanded pupils. The beauty of the man, so stunning that even looking up at him felt daring, flowed along the corners of his mouth. In his deep blue gaze, Livia stood. His eyes, capturing only her, sparkled with amusement.

Triton!

His name slashed through her heart. Regaining her composure, she quickly surveyed her surroundings.

The ship, nearly sunk with only the stern remaining, countless soldiers of Triton, and a massive tentacle she had never seen before.

…Tentacle?

“Oh my, what is that…?”

The woman froze in surprise at the sight of his cherished pet octopus.

Watching her step back hesitantly almost tempted him to call the Kraken closer to frighten her even more.

However, since the Kraken, Sympho, and Neo were essentially natural enemies, they despised each other. Even now, Sympho, forced to linger near Triton, bared its fierce teeth as if ready to attack the Kraken at any moment.

Suppressing his disappointment, Triton descended the wave-formed stairs himself. For him, the sea was both earth and sky, making such a feat possible. As if he were walking on solid ground, he calmly approached her and bent down, observing her as she floundered in the water.

“You fled to hell to escape me, yet here you are, alive and well.”

Livia shuddered and glared at him, her face slightly flushed. She seemed to recall their last encounter.

Triton thought her reaction wasn’t bad. He vividly remembered the sensation of his fingers probing inside her; surely, she hadn’t forgotten either.

“I’ve never met a human like you who refuses to die.”

Triton extended his hand toward the woman glaring at him and softly warned her.

“But… next time, it would be wise not to die until I allow it, Livia Horn.”

Even after staring at Triton’s hand, Livia dared to ignore it.

She even turned her head away, refusing to take it, which made Dugong watching from afar cover his mouth with both hands in shock. His bushy beard trembled with surprise.

However, Triton didn’t particularly mind Livia’s defiance.

When has this human woman ever been easy for him? In fact, the more stubbornly Livia behaved, the better excuse it gave Triton to exert control, so it wasn’t necessarily bad for him.

Soon, he ascended the waves and sat back down. At the same time, chains of water formed around Livia, swiftly lifting her and placing her on Triton’s lap.

Livia’s eyes widened in disbelief, and she flopped around on Triton’s lap like a fish out of water.

“No, put me down…!”

“Shh, Livia. The execution isn’t over yet.”

He whispered as he pulled Livia closer, holding her waist tightly. Even the slightest touch made her small body flinch.

Reacting to the word ‘execution,’ Livia stiffened like a stone and looked in the direction he indicated. Her eyes narrowed as she spotted the men hanging from the wrecked end of the ship.

“Just wait a moment. That one is the last.”

Triton whispered gently as he pulled her stiffened waist closer. The way she flinched each time was amusing.

Her hips squirmed on his thigh, uncomfortable with the position. She seemed unaware of how provocatively her soft buttocks were rubbing against his firm thigh, showing no fear.

Triton felt a heat rising in his lower abdomen. His hardened member twitched upward, becoming rigid.

It was a curious thing. Even when worshippers of Dionysus, dressed in barely-there clothes, fawned over him at his feet, he hadn’t been moved. Yet, here he was, aroused by a mere squirming movement. What was it about this unremarkable woman that so easily inflamed his cold flesh?

Livia, who had been wriggling, seemed to sense something between her thighs and froze, glancing downward. Before her irreverent gaze could discover the thick column of his arousal, Triton raised his hand to catch her attention.

“Watch closely, Livia.”

Triton raised his hand toward the man hanging at the end of the ship. The old captain, realizing it was his turn, screamed.

A water arrow, silently created, shot toward the old captain. With a final cry, the pirate’s head was pierced, and he slid into the sea. The waiting Kraken snatched the falling corpse with its suction-cupped red tentacle, bringing it to its mouth.

A cheerful crunching sound of bones breaking echoed, and Livia, who had been frozen, grimaced and turned to Triton.

“How can you do such a terrible thing…”

Triton found Livia’s unyielding gaze truly intriguing.

Even men with big, muscular bodies would cower after a few trials, just narrowly escaping death. Yet, she never lost her spirit. Did surviving death only make her temperament worse?

“Why did you sink that ship? Was it just because they were human? For such a trivial reason?”

Triton smiled silently.

If death came simply because one was “merely” a certain kind of being, then he had endured far more on this side.

“Dugong,” he called.

Triton extended his hand toward Dugong, who was waiting at a distance. Dugong, stepping across the sea in a single stride, handed a small, Blood-covered baby to Triton. Livia, who was sitting on his lap, instinctively took the baby into her arms.

The baby was extremely pale and silent, curled up and breathing faintly as if it didn’t know how to cry. Its body was covered with pieces of scales, a thin membrane as if it had just emerged from the womb, and a very fragile-looking translucent tail.

Livia gazed at the small life suddenly placed in her arms with trembling eyes.

“It’s a baby siren that lost its mother to humans,” Triton explained.

As his hand hovered over the baby’s face, a small droplet of water washed away the impurities clinging to the baby’s body.

“Just because it’s ‘merely’ a siren,” he added.

Triton’s words struck Livia’s heart. She felt something inside her crumble slightly, though she couldn’t quite identify what it was.

“You said you wanted revenge?” he asked.

The baby opened its eyes as Triton brushed its hair aside. Within its quivering, raised eyelids, water-colored eyes shimmered quietly. In those clear eyes, untouched by prejudice, both humans and gods were reflected side by side.

“But Livia,” he continued.

The baby, blinking its eyelids, smiled innocently. It wiggled its tiny hand and grabbed Livia’s rigid finger, making her heart drop with a thud.

“What would happen to this sea if you harmed me?” Triton asked.

Livia was taken aback by a question she had never considered.

They said gods couldn’t die. Everyone said so, and Echidna said so too. Therefore, she had never thought about what would happen to the sea governed by him, or even considered such a thought.

“That is…” she began.

“Of course, I won’t die,” Triton said, “but during the time I’m absent, what might happen to this sea… Have you ever thought about that?”

Livia looked down quietly at the baby bringing her finger to its tiny mouth. It wasn’t human, yet it couldn’t be called a monster either. This small, fragile being looked up at her.

This little one was what those pirates had “hunted.” So, who was the monster to this child?

…The answer was all too obvious.

“Or do the seas mean nothing to you humans, as always?” Triton asked.

Livia snapped her head up to look at him. Her eyes trembled as if she had been struck. The god, with a compassionate face, whispered as he caressed the cheek of the woman he had killed multiple times.

“Treating it like an ownerless warehouse or a dumping ground where anything can be discarded,” he said.

“No!” she shouted, startled.

The baby siren, clutching her finger, began to cry. The frightened child couldn’t even make a sound, trembling as it tried to endure its fear.

In that sight, Livia recalled her own childhood. Or could she even call it a childhood?

Between the smelly alleyways of a small port town, a tiny baby wrapped in dirty cloth had opened its eyes on the ground…

Startled by the barking of a dog, it opened its eyes but couldn’t make a sound out of fear. Thirsty and cold, yet unable to do anything, paralyzed by suffocating fear…

Her own pitiful and wretched self.

Livia carefully embraced the sobbing siren baby, who was hiccupping from holding its breath for so long. Even with her awkward touch, the baby quickly calmed down. Her fingertips, holding the small body, trembled slightly.

Triton watched the scene unfolding on his lap with a leisurely gaze.

The baby had been taken away by the nymphs, and Livia had once more lost her voice to Triton. It seemed that the god of shepherds, who had returned her voice, had greatly annoyed him.

“Bringing the stench of goat kids into the sea.”

Despite being a deity himself, Triton didn’t hesitate to show his hostility toward Pan. He appeared particularly displeased with Livia’s voice, which had been influenced by Pan’s power. It was as if she had brought something unclean into the sea, and Triton’s blue eyes flashed fiercely. Livia, suddenly voiceless again, angrily lunged at him, but she was no match for his strength.

“Since another god is here, stay put and don’t cause unnecessary commotion outside.”

Practically dragged to the bed, bound by his chains of water, Livia glared at him incredulously. Triton whispered coolly, unfazed by her defiance.

“Just wait here quietly until you can attack me again, Livia. If you behave, I’ll give your voice back.”

With that threatening remark, he abruptly left. It was absurd. Even if he looked down on her, what sense did it make to bring someone who was determined to kill him to his bedroom? He might as well have locked her in a dungeon.

The fact that she hadn’t managed to land a single effective blow on him made her think he underestimated her.

Next time, for sure.

Grinding her teeth in frustration, she glared at the empty space where he had vanished. Even when she found herself alone, she remained bound and unable to move for a while. Her body, worn out from hardship, felt heavy, and as she lay on the soft bed, sleep crept up on her. When she finally shook off the drowsiness and opened her eyes, the outside had turned completely dark. Sometime during her nap, the chains had released her, and she was free.

She sprang up and, ignoring Triton’s command to stay put, immediately headed outside.

“Of course, I won’t die, but during the time I’m absent, what might happen to this sea… Have you ever thought about that?”

Recalling Triton’s words about another god, Livia wandered outside, curious about who it might be. But today, the palace was eerily empty. Where has everyone gone?

After wandering for a while, she looked up at the brilliantly shining golden palace. A place thoroughly hidden from the humans outside the sea. A beautiful, peaceful underwater paradise.

Though he was practically her nemesis, the god of the sea protected and ruled this palace, safeguarding the ocean.

A sea without such a god…

She had never considered that before. And as he said, he was an “immortal” being, wasn’t he? Even if his heart were pierced, he wouldn’t truly die, so how could he disappear?

Livia felt confused.

The acrid, ashen smell of her family burning still lingered vividly in her nose. The terror of being sucked into the black sea when she fell from the cliff was just as fresh. In her desperation and grievance, she had prayed earnestly, and only Echidna had answered her prayers.

But was this revenge truly justified?

If asked that, she couldn’t easily open her mouth. The confusion tormented her. The reason she thought was gone pushed her into a corner.

Feeling suffocated, Livia stepped outside. Jellyfish glowing in the sky and pots filled with moonlight spread their light on the ground. Jellyfish danced in the air as if they were following the cheerful music that seemed to come from nowhere.

Livia, feeling entranced, followed the mesmerizing scene. She soon reached a banquet hall. Between tall, thick pillars, she saw nymphs laughing, chatting, and dancing. Among them were sirens and sea spirits.

Drawn as if she were enchanted, Livia approached the banquet hall. The lively music she had heard earlier was undoubtedly coming from here. Concealing herself behind a thick pillar, she peeked inside and saw a man dressed extravagantly, playing a tambourine and dancing. Behind him, a beautiful siren strummed a lyre, singing a hymn in his honor.

Life on land or sea, it seemed similar.

Watching them laugh and chatter, Livia suddenly felt estranged from her own life. She once had times like that too.

Times when she danced, sang, and was happier than anyone else…

How did it come to this?

As she blankly reflected on her past, the faces of her enemies who had ruined her life emerged at the end of her thoughts.

Yes, it all circles back to the beginning. Her dazed expression sharpened.

Attaching the word “justified” to “revenge” was contradictory. It was about settling a grudge. Wasn’t it the most emotional and irrational act? No matter what reason was attached, revenge was just retaliation.

Livia wanted to do it, and she was determined to do whatever it took. That included letting go of guilt.

“Ah… you have a face that says you’re up to no good.”

At that moment, someone’s face suddenly appeared in front of Livia. Startled, she stepped back, her eyes widening in surprise.

‘…Zagreus?’

A face identical to his was smiling brightly at her. The resemblance was so striking that even Livia was momentarily confused, but upon closer inspection, she noticed the differences.

This man had distinct features that set him apart from Zagreus. A small mole beneath his right eye, red lips, cloudy eyes, and the strong smell of alcohol—all of it exuded decadence and debauchery.

He leaned on a staff entwined with grapevines, and his attire was quite a sight. He was bare-chested above his belt, and his lower garments were so loose they seemed ready to fall off at any moment.

Soon, a large feline creature with black spots prowled behind him.

Livia recognized who he was.

The god of wine, Dionysus.

Livia had heard stories about Dionysus. Phedum held this god in high reverence, always praising the frenzy of Dionysus. He claimed that purity and chastity were shackles created by those who possessed them, while the desire for freedom and pleasure was the essence of humanity.

“You know who I am, don’t you?”

Dionysus looked at Livia’s wary face and smiled broadly. The staggering man stood before Livia, and without giving her a chance to evade, he reached out and pulled her by the waist.



Livia stiffened, gasping for breath. Dionysus lifted her chin with his fingertips. As they got closer, the smell of alcohol became even more intense. Normally, it would have made her nauseous, but the scent from the god of wine was just sweet and fragrant, intoxicating on its own.

“Poor thing. You look so weary.”

She wanted to tell him to let go, but with her voice taken, she couldn’t utter a word. As she mouthed silently, desperate to scream, Dionysus laughed.

“Shall I help you forget your sorrows? You could be nothing but happy if you become my follower…”

His languid voice, like overripe wine, began to dominate Livia’s mind. Though she hadn’t drunk a drop, her head felt foggy, as if she were intoxicated. Just as Dionysus’s lips were about to touch her unresisting ones—

Growl!

His leopard leapt over them, and at the same time, a black shark lunged from above, baring its teeth to swallow the leopard whole.

Roar!

The leopard’s scream vanished into the shark’s mouth. In the meantime, Dionysus quickly rolled on the ground with Livia in his arms. With a click of his tongue, their bodies separated.



Awakening from the strange stupor, Livia let out a gasp and pushed him away. She couldn’t comprehend what had almost happened. Backing away in a daze, she left without looking back.

Dionysus lay sprawled on the ground, clicking his tongue regretfully, and then grabbed the black shark that attempted to follow Livia.

“If you’re going, you should spit it out first.”

With a look that said ‘I won’t eat it,’ the shark spat out the leopard. Though it had swallowed it boldly, it never intended to actually eat it, so the leopard survived with only scratches from the shark’s teeth. Without a backward glance, the shark followed the woman.

Growl…

The leopard curled up pitifully beside its master. Dionysus reached out and healed the wounds on the creature’s fur. Burying his face in the animal’s soft fur, he chuckled.

“Who would’ve thought it was that.”

What a shame. He wondered what the sea god’s face would have looked like if it had gulped it down. Seeing that he had attacked that shark, it seemed he was quite concerned…

Dionysus lay back, closed his eyes, and hummed a tune. Before long, a black snake slithered out from beneath a pile of seaweed. It sneaked into the folds of Dionysus’s fallen garment, stole a bottle of his hidden madness-inducing wine, and slithered away.

Though Dionysus’s eyes briefly caught the snake’s tail, he merely turned away with an amused smile, pretending not to notice.

A little chaos at a drinking party was always welcome. Anyone could go mad, and madness was the delight of a feast. Dionysus continued his leisurely humming.

The final night of the feast in the sea was truly joyous.

Livia Horn ran frantically, until she finally stopped when she was out of breath.

She couldn’t remember anything about what had happened. When Dionysus approached, she felt strangely good; her mind went blank, and she thought it didn’t matter anyway. Although she hadn’t consumed any alcohol, she felt as if she were intoxicated.

It was dangerous.

If she had stayed there just a little longer, she couldn’t even imagine what might have happened. As she caught her breath with her knees on the ground, Livia looked up at the shadow passing by her feet. Somehow, the black shark was circling above her head again.

Could it be that it saved her earlier?

That enemy of her, saving her? No way. That black shark always bared its teeth at her. It would nudge her with its body, picking fights, and last time, didn’t it run to Triton with her in its mouth like some prey?

Embarrassingly, Livia had fainted with the shark’s teeth on her. It moved so fast that her body shook and twisted wildly, making it impossible to stay conscious. She wished she had remained unconscious longer. Unfortunately, she woke up right in the middle of enemy territory.

Recalling that dizzying moment, Livia let out a long sigh.

The more she thought about it, the less she believed that the black shark had intentionally saved her. Maybe it got excited seeing a land beast. Or perhaps it didn’t know Dionysus was there and got excited when it spotted her.

Whatever the reason, it didn’t matter. Right now, she just wanted to be alone.

‘Go away.’

Livia waved her hand at the black shark. Being voiceless was inconvenient every time. But the black shark seemed to interpret her gesture as a signal or threat, and instead, it charged at her with fierce speed and bumped into her.

Ugh.

With a sound of something breaking, her slender body rolled over. It wasn’t painful, but the impact felt like her insides were turning upside down, and Livia’s face turned pale in an instant.

“…Ugh.”

She hurriedly vomited. Since she hadn’t eaten anything, only stomach acid came out, but the sensation of her insides flipping was horrible. Wiping her mouth, Livia glared at the shark with disbelief.

It might have been her imagination, but the shark seemed a bit cautious. Its vigorously wagging tail slowed down a little.

Damn toothy fish…

Grinding her teeth, Livia picked up a stone nearby and threw it at the shark with all her might.

Thunk.

With a dull sound, it hit the shark’s forehead squarely. Annoyingly, it didn’t seem to bother it much. Still, whether it noticed Livia’s displeasure or was upset itself, it circled around once and then quietly flew off to another place.

Only after the shark completely disappeared did Livia relax and slump to the ground. Crawling under a giant coral tree, she leaned against it for a moment.

She was tired.

She must have come quite far because the music from the feast was barely audible. Only a deep, heavy silence filled the air. The coral tree was enormous, and its shadow was very dark. Without a light, no one would be able to find her.

Resting in that darkness, Livia closed her eyes for a moment. She wanted to rest here, where no one else was, even if just for a short while.

However, before long, Livia had to end her brief respite.

“Get out of the way, go away!!!”

It was because of a scream she heard not far away.



Audike, who had been enjoying the feast with her fellow nymphs, stepped outside in a bad mood.

It was because of Letis, who started speaking frivolously the moment she drank. Despite being scolded by Nephea, Letis couldn’t stop badmouthing the human woman again.

“You all know, right? How vile humans are. Just thinking about that vile human being in our palace makes me want to throw up.”

“Filthy human woman.”

“That vulgar wench! It wouldn’t be enough to tear her apart! Next time I have to bring food, I might just release pufferfish poison. Come to think of it, that’s not a bad idea. Maybe I’ll go hunt pufferfish tomorrow. Or blue octopus poison might work too.”

As Letis’s words became increasingly offensive, her companions gradually left her side.

Letis used to gain popularity by often gifting her companions with pretty coral pins and pearl earrings, but even they left her because of her excessive slander. Just as Audike was about to leave with them, Letis suddenly grabbed her wrist.

“You’re the one who brought that human woman, right?”

“…What?”

“I heard everything. You were the one who brought her, right? Why did you do it? What’s your motive?”

The issue had already been resolved with Phorkys and Nephea. They had mistaken her for a nymph, and due to a shortage of hands, they had taken her along to help with work. Although the feast was disrupted that day, there hadn’t been any further remarks from Triton, so Audike’s involvement was concluded.

Nephea had even advised her to feign ignorance, as discussing it further would only lead to more gossip.

However, somehow, Letis had discovered the situation and was now making an issue of it.

“There’s no motive; it just happened that way. I’ve already explained everything to the higher-ups. Why do you keep making things up? Aren’t you the one with ulterior motives?”

“What did you say? Say it again! What did you say?”

She easily dodged Letis, who staggered and lunged at her, and stepped outside. Letis slipped and fell to the ground, screaming in anger. Audike had heard that Letis had once been hurt by a human. She didn’t know the details, but Letis’s hatred for humans was excessive. Her reverence for the gods was also extreme.

‘Is she really going to get pufferfish poison or something?’

It was entirely possible. Audike was genuinely concerned that some action needed to be taken.

‘I can’t let this go. I should talk to Nephea about it tomorrow.’

Fatigue washed over her. Forget the feast; all she wanted was to get some rest today. Since all her colleagues were at the feast, it might actually be nice to rest quietly alone. She was crossing the corridor at the end of the main palace when it happened.

Audike suddenly looked up at the place where the master resided.

A vast window that neither held back those leaving nor prevented those entering. Though it was indoors due to the roof, if one desired, they could see inside from anywhere outside and enter at will.

But who would dare to easily spy on or intrude into the domain of the absolute ruler?

That room, open on all sides, held significance because of this. Nothing in this sea could threaten him. This world was entirely his, and everything within it lay under his dominion.

However, something not belonging to him now occupied the realm of the absolute ruler.

Something the sea did not embrace, something from beyond the water.

A being born of chaos, swimming through the air, a creature of the earth.

Audike recalled the human woman she had briefly locked eyes with earlier that day.

Eyes that shone brightly, skin tanned unlike the pale sea nymphs, hair like red coral.

In hindsight, she was clearly different. Perhaps that’s why she caught her attention. She remembered how she had unknowingly taken her by the hand and led her around, not realizing she was human. It had caused some trouble, but there was nothing to be done about it now.

The best course was to avoid getting involved any further.

With a brief sigh, Audike hurried her steps. The shortcut to her quarters passed through the shell graveyard. It might be a bit eerie to go there now, but it was only a short distance. She was nearing the large, unusually dark coral tree when it happened.

As if to chastise her for her complacency, something suddenly appeared from the darkness, startling her.

“Oh, hello, beautiful?”

She was so shocked that she couldn’t even scream. Audike bit her lip as she backed away in surprise.

A satyr!

This was bad. She hadn’t expected that beast to be here!

Satyrs were half-human, half-beast creatures that Dionysus kept around. They mostly guarded Dionysus’s vineyards but occasionally ventured out when transporting his wine.

Blinded by lust, these brutes would raise their genitals at any moment, attacking both humans and nymphs indiscriminately.

Triton had banned satyrs from entering because they harassed the nymphs so much. So Dionysus usually didn’t bring them here, but it seemed this one had come to deliver wine. Normally, they wore collars on such occasions, but it looked like this one had broken its collar and escaped.

“Oh, you don’t know how long I’ve been waiting for someone to come out.”

The satyr licked its lips hungrily as it slowly approached Audike. Its grotesque member swung between its legs, and the broken collar dangled from its chest.

Audike quickly turned to flee, but the satyr was faster. It blocked her path in a single leap, grinning hideously as it drooled.

“Come on, let’s play.”


“Don’t talk crazy. Get away from me! If you touch me, I won’t let it slide!”

“Huuuh! Wh-what do you mean you won’t let it slide? H-huh?”

The Satyr immediately lunged at Audike.

“Move, get away!”

Audike screamed and tensed her whole body. Sea nymphs had the ability to release an electric current in moments of crisis. While it might be a deadly attack for humans, to a half-human, half-beast like the Satyr, it was merely a tingle.

“T-t-tickles!”

The Satyr shook his hand, which had been knocked back by the current, and shivered with delight. Then, a sticky liquid began to trickle down from the tip of his erect genitalia.

It was horrific—so horrific that it made one want to vomit.

The grinning Satyr suddenly grabbed Audike’s wrist.

“Ahhh, let go of this!”

As Audike released another current in a fit, the Satyr shuddered. However, the grip on her wrist didn’t weaken; it only grew stronger. His filthy breathing became even more ragged.

Audike felt so frustrated and wronged that she was on the verge of tears but had to face reality.

This wasn’t going to work. She was going to be overpowered. At this point, it was better to die than to suffer. Clenching her teeth, she prayed to the virgin goddess to help her die quickly and mercifully. But at that moment,

Thud!

With a groan, the Satyr’s body slid to the ground. At the same time, red bloodstains bloomed like a mirage above the beast’s head. Audike’s eyes widened as she looked beyond the crimson haze.



There stood a human woman holding a giant clam shell, as big as a small rock.



“…Thank you for helping me.”

In response to Audike’s gratitude, Livia smiled and lifted the corners of her mouth as if to say it was nothing. She mouthed words silently to Audike. Audike, tilting her head, closely observed the shape of her lips.

“You can’t speak? Why?”

Livia mouthed again.

“Triton, no, Lord Triton took it away?”

As Livia nodded, Audike looked puzzled.

“Why? Is there any reason to take the voice of a woman he likes?”

It sounded strange. Had she misheard ‘trying to kill’ as something else? If he wanted to kill someone, he could just do it, so why bother cutting out a tongue?

‘…To torture?’

Thinking that way, it made some sense. Livia, who had found her own reasoning, looked at Audike, who was scratching her chin with a complicated expression.

The small gills under her chin were now calmly hidden, as the shock seemed to have subsided. Unless she was startled, one wouldn’t even know the gills were there.

Fortunately, it seemed she hadn’t been hurt, as Livia had arrived not too late. Livia glanced at Audike with relief and then looked coldly at the half-human, half-beast sprawled on the ground.

Though he had been knocked out by a blow to the back of the head, he wasn’t dead. His twitching toes and the grotesque thing hanging limp between them were visible.

Seeing that made her even angrier. It reminded her of someone who couldn’t control their instincts and did bad things among the sheep.

Phedum!

Grinding her teeth, Livia lifted her foot and stomped hard on the wriggling thing like an eel, crushing it.

“Ugh, ack…!”

The half-human, half-beast creature, who had been trembling in shock, fainted with his eyes rolled back. Froth formed at his mouth and then quickly vanished.

Whether he lived or died didn’t matter. When she turned her head swiftly, she saw Audike, wide-eyed, coming into view. Her gills had slightly lifted again, indicating she was a bit startled.

“You… you… are more than you seem…”

Livia gave Audike an awkward smile to reassure her. Audike, who had been looking at her, touched her forehead and shook her head.

An awkward silence lingered for a moment. As Audike and Livia watched each other cautiously, their eyes met at the same time.

Audike was the first to burst into laughter. What started as a small chuckle gradually grew louder until it became a clear, refreshing laugh that filled the air. Her laughter was so infectious that even the corners of Livia’s mouth began to twitch involuntarily.

Eventually, Livia couldn’t hold back her laughter either. Although she covered her mouth with the back of her hand to stifle the sound, it had been a long time since she had laughed like that.

She couldn’t remember the last time she had laughed so freely. Someone once said that laughter has the power to overcome despair, and it seemed true. The heavy burden on her heart suddenly became bearable. At that moment, it didn’t matter that they were underwater or that she was facing a nymph. They just looked at each other, laughed, and laughed again.

“I’ve never heard the sound of balls bursting before!”

Audike stammered as she laughed, clutching her stomach. It took a while for both of them to finally stop laughing. Once the laughter subsided, an unusual silence settled over them.

After hesitating for a while, Audike took a deep breath as if she were about to say something difficult and then spoke quickly.

“Again, thank you for saving me. But you did deceive me once. As a nymph who values trust greatly, I have no intention of being friends with someone who has deceived me. So, it’s best if we don’t get involved any further.”

…Friends.

Livia, who had never considered such a thought, looked visibly surprised. Of course, it would be nice to be friends, but as Audike said, their relationship was too ambiguous, and the situation was not appropriate.

“No matter what face you make, my mind won’t change.”

Audike said coldly, interpreting Livia’s expression in some way. However, the way she glanced at Livia, as if checking her reaction, was far from stern.

Livia nodded to show she understood. It seemed like they should go their separate ways now, but despite her firm words, Audike didn’t move at all.

When Livia looked at her as if asking why she wasn’t leaving, Audike suddenly realized and hurriedly stood up.

Goodbye.

Livia stood there, waving at Audike. But after walking a few steps with determination, Audike stopped and turned around.

“But why aren’t you going?”

Well… Livia didn’t really have anywhere to go. She had no fixed place to sleep. She usually rested in inconspicuous spots or was knocked out by Triton. Otherwise, she would hide somewhere to ambush him.

So today, she was planning to rest here and then look for a place called the ‘library’ when the sun rose. Of course, Triton had told her to stay in his chamber, but Livia had no reason to be there. After all, it was her enemy’s bed; why would she stay there?

“…Are you lost? Do you not know where Lord Triton’s chamber is?”

Perhaps misunderstanding her silence, Audike said something strange.

“Oh dear… That won’t do. I’ll take you there.”

Before Livia could react, Audike grabbed her wrist and pulled her along.



Audike was so strong that Livia found herself being dragged to the main palace in no time. Realizing she might actually be taken to the chamber, Livia planted her feet firmly in the corridor of the main palace.

“Okay. You know how to get there from here, right?”

Livia hadn’t intended to deceive Audike this time, but it seemed she had unintentionally caused a misunderstanding.

Despite her efforts to move her lips, Audike wasn’t looking at her, so her words didn’t get across. Livia had no choice but to nod quickly and push Audike’s back.

As she had felt before, this nymph seemed to be very kind-hearted and gentle. Livia forcefully sent her off, even as Audike kept trying to look back.

Finally, Audike’s figure completely disappeared from view. Only then could Livia leave the main palace. She didn’t know how much time had passed, but the music that had been playing in the distance had almost faded away. It was time to find a place to rest.

Where should she go? Perhaps the underground entrance where she had hidden before was the best option? As she turned her head, looking for a place to go, a splash of water erupted from beneath her feet.



In an instant, her body was lifted into the air.



“You seem to lack determination toward your goal.”

She was thrown back onto the rocking bed.

And it wasn’t an empty bed either; it was the bed where Triton was reclining. The smooth yet firm texture of his skin was felt beneath her cheek. As she quickly sat up, startled, those were the words she heard.

…What did he mean by determination toward her goal?

Frowning at the unexpected words, Livia looked at him, and his hand touched her cheek. She flinched involuntarily but didn’t pull away. His cool fingers brushed the tired skin beneath her eyes.

“If you truly desire something, you must keep your eyes on the goal, Livia.”


The slow and leisurely tone was excessively sweet. However, the moment Livia slapped his hand away, the hand that had brushed past her cheek gripped the back of her neck tightly.



She was helplessly pulled forward by the force. His breath grazed her tense cheek.

In that instant, her breath caught. It felt as if a beast had bitten her nape. Holding her breath, Livia tensed up, and a languid voice flowed into her ear.

“How do you plan to stab my heart with a dagger like this?”

His voice was so soft that, from his tone alone, he seemed like a very gentle man. Triton seemed to find great amusement in deceiving and teasing her in this manner.

To her, he was confusing. And if this confusion grew, it would dull her resolve.

With a firm expression, Livia mouthed the words.

‘Give me back my voice.’

Watching her lips move, he raised his eyebrows as if he didn’t understand. Although she knew it was a lie, she had no choice but to persist. Livia moved her lips again.

‘Give me back my voice.’

She spoke slowly, putting emphasis on her lips so he couldn’t possibly misunderstand. Then, his head tilted back slightly, and he gave a leisurely smile, as if enjoying her impatience.

“Hmm.”

He was too close, far too close. Moreover, Triton’s hand was wrapped around her waist. Too many parts of her were pressed against him. She tried to push him away, but it was futile. His long, beautiful silvery-blue hair tickled Livia’s chest.

“What should I do? I have no idea what you’re saying.”

Frustration flared up instantly. If she couldn’t push him away, she might as well pull him closer. Livia yanked on his hair, which had been bothering her for a while. His head tilted slightly in the direction she pulled. His expression shifted subtly, as if he hadn’t expected this kind of attack.

Was he a little flustered? Serves him right. A slight smirk twisted Livia’s lips upward.

Feigning to release her grip, Livia pulled on his hair again, this time with more force. Though she applied more strength than before, he remained unmoved, as if he had anticipated it this time.

Even his hair was sturdy… How infuriating.

Meeting his narrowing gaze, she suddenly felt uncomfortable with his unwavering stare and turned her head slightly. He grabbed her chin.

“Do you want your voice back?”

Finally, the words she wanted to hear. Livia nodded, keeping a neutral expression to hide her excessive relief.

Triton lowered his gaze, seemingly in thought.

His long eyelashes cast shadows over his eyes. They were a slightly darker silvery-blue than his hair. He was so close. Livia had to be careful even with her breathing.

She didn’t want to admit it, but he was indeed a breathtakingly beautiful god. His eyes, nose, and mouth were the same as other creatures, yet why did he possess such a dazzling radiance?

Was it because of his mysterious eyes that humans couldn’t even dream of? Or was it his hair, shimmering like moonlight through snow? Or perhaps it was the unique aura that only he possessed?

Whatever the reason, his appearance was enough to captivate any creature. Anything with eyes would be momentarily entranced. It seemed unlikely that any artist could capture such a face, such a form, in sculpture.

As she carefully observed his face, Livia suddenly noticed his blue eyes coolly meeting hers. She tried not to show her surprise, but she awkwardly turned her gaze away. Before she looked away, she thought she saw him smile.

Triton took hold of Livia’s hand, guiding it to the area just above his throat.

“Here.”

What was he trying to say? Livia returned her gaze to him. She focused on the spot where her hand rested. It was the hollow where his jaw met his neck, and Triton whispered with her hand placed there.

“Your voice is right here.”

Triton said something Livia couldn’t understand. As she continued to stare at his neck, he lifted her hand to his lips.



Startled, she tried to pull her hand back with force, but it wouldn’t budge. Instead, her hand was drawn further into his mouth, as if guided by his intention.

“I hid it deep inside here.”

Every time his tongue brushed against her fingertips, it seemed to sharpen her senses there. Only then did Triton’s words finally sink in.

So, her voice was inside his throat?

…Why? While she pondered this, he leisurely watched her puzzled expression and suddenly interlocked his fingers with hers, pulling her arms behind her back as if binding them.

“…Ah, ugh!”

With both hands restrained, her body leaned more towards his shoulder. To make matters worse, the more she struggled, the more his thighs tightened around her lower body. She was completely trapped.

As she twisted her body to escape, Triton exhaled a low sigh through his lips.

“You shouldn’t move like that.”

At his strange warning, Livia momentarily stopped moving.

“Surely you know what your stomach is pressing against right now?”

My stomach?

Livia Horn finally felt something stabbing into her stomach, causing her pain. It was long, hard, and thick, wedged between her and Triton. As she wondered what it could be, a look of shock slowly spread across her face.

No way.

She could feel the shape of something hard pressing against her thin clothing and even thinner skin.

“Have you ever heard how easily gods get aroused, Livia?” Triton’s lips curled into a twisted smile, as if he had read the shock in Livia’s eyes. Her innocent reaction seemed to intrigue him.

What should I do?

She froze, as if she had stopped breathing, and a breath of air brushed past her ear. She flinched at the unpleasant teasing, glaring at Triton with a scrunched-up expression. He chuckled and added, “You laugh and chat so easily with the blue-haired nymph, yet you always give me this look.”

…What?

She was startled to the point of goosebumps. The blue-haired nymph must have been Audike. Had he seen her laughing and chatting with her? Where? How?

But he didn’t let her dwell on her thoughts for long. He tapped his throat and said, “You said you need your voice?”

Of course, she needed it, and it was only right to get back what was hers. Yet, here he was, with her hands tied, urging her to retrieve it, which was absurd. And why on earth had he hidden her voice there? Livia even doubted the truth of his words.

“Why are you glaring at me? Ah, are you suspicious?”

As if understanding, he nodded and suddenly blew a breath towards her face. The breeze that brushed her forehead and cheeks turned into bubbles that rose one by one.

When one of them popped, Livia’s voice was heard.

“…Oh god, actually, I’m not very strong, so I can’t handle alcohol well.”

This was something she had said at the banquet where she first met Triton.

“So unless you intend to take away the second glass…”

The second bubble burst. She remembered what she said next.

“Would you feed it to me directly?”

She couldn’t recall what had possessed her to say such a thing back then. It was a remark made in desperation to escape the situation…

She never imagined she’d hear it with her own ears like this. At that moment, Triton tapped his lips, as if telling her to look at them.

Then he parted his lips to show the inside. On his red tongue lay a white pearl.

Livia instantly realized that the pearl contained her voice. She had to retrieve it.

…But how?

There was a way that came to mind, but she pretended not to know. She wanted to believe he wouldn’t demand such a method. Besides, she thought he had no reason to want that. Their relationship wasn’t supposed to be connected “that way.”

At least, according to her common sense.

“If you can retrieve this, I promise never to touch your voice again.”

But it seemed he didn’t share her view.


Although he had whimsically taken what originally belonged to her, he spoke as if he were doing Livia a great favor.

Most gods behaved this way. They used their power as an excuse to manipulate humans at will, much like a child innocently blocking an ant’s path with a large stone, without any sense of guilt.

Even if it was unfair, there was nothing a tiny ant could do against a human. At most, it might hide in a pant leg and bite a toe.

…But humans often forgot that being bitten by an ant could sting quite a bit.

Livia, who had been panting, suddenly lifted her head. Then, with all her might, she pressed her lips against Triton’s unguarded mouth.

The first thing she did was bite his unsuspecting lips as hard as she could. She gave it her all, but she couldn’t cause any harm. Instead, Triton curled the corners of his lips, seemingly amused by her attempt.

It was a kiss that couldn’t truly be called a kiss. It was merely a series of poking, prying, and chasing, focused solely on that pursuit.

Yet, their tangled breaths grew rougher, and her body kept heating up uncontrollably. On top of that, there was the sensation of his organ pressing as if it would pierce her stomach…

The more breathless she became, the dizzier her head felt. To escape this strange and elusive sensation, she needed to snatch that pearl quickly. Livia clung even more to Triton’s lips. Each time their wet mucous membranes collided and parted, a slick, suggestive sound echoed.

Pearl, pearl…

No matter how much she pressed her lips and scraped her tongue, she couldn’t feel the pearl. A frustrated, groaning sound escaped from Livia’s mouth. At that moment, the hand that had been restraining her loosened. Livia eagerly pulled Triton’s shoulders closer. Her eyes, which had been defiantly raised, grew hazy as her breathing quickened.

Why can’t I reach it, why…

Desperate, Livia urgently pulled Triton’s tongue into her mouth. Triton, as if waiting for this, swirled inside her.

“Ha… Uh…!”

In an instant, the tables turned.

His tongue was moist, moderately cool, and unbelievably soft as it dominated Livia’s tongue. Their tongues roamed each other’s territories. In that moment, finding the pearl no longer mattered.

She was sucked in to the root, nibbled thoroughly. The tingling pain and the slick friction of the mucous membrane made her dizzy. He embraced her tightly, supporting her swaying back.

“If you keep thrusting your tongue like that, it only excites me more, Livia,” Triton quietly remarked, licking her panting lips.

“Do you want your voice back that badly?”

Livia glared at him with reddened eyes, her trembling lips moving silently.

‘Give it back.’

Between her swollen lips, her red tongue flicked enticingly. Triton found it quite alluring. The urge to bite that soft, sweet tongue until it bled surged within him.

How could it be so sweet? If he were to bite that tongue and taste Blood, even that would surely be sweet. No, it would be sweet. Without a doubt, it would be sweet.

Triton licked his lips with his tongue. The thought of devouring this small, stubborn woman made his mouth dry and his insides tighten.

His erection swelled painfully.

He held Livia tightly, leaving no space between them, and thrust his hips upward. The woman, startled by the sudden assult, let out a gasp, but he paid no mind. His thick, hard erection rubbed messily beneath her thin clothes.

“Ha, ugh…! Hup!”

How did Echidna find this? How did you end up with someone like Echidna? He didn’t like that it had passed through Echidna’s hands before reaching him. He was annoyed at his own foolishness for not discovering it first.

Livia, who had been letting out rough, surprised breaths, squirmed her hips and twisted her waist. Her plump buttocks thudded against his inner thighs.

Even that was enough to make Triton’s body tremble with pleasure. How exhilarating would it be to truly devour her?

Triton moaned languidly and grasped Livia’s buttocks, spreading them apart.

Her small underwear was pushed aside, revealing her wet vulva. Triton’s clothing was also pushed aside by her squirming buttocks. Then, his barely restrained erection sprang up and jabbed at Livia’s entrance.



Livia’s eyes flew open. Beyond her shocked pupils, there was astonishment and fear. Trembling, she tensed her thighs and lifted her hips to create some distance. But this only caused her entrance to press against his erect member. If he thrust his hips just a little, he could penetrate her.

Realizing her mistake too late, Livia tensed her thighs even more. She didn’t know that her entrance, twitching against his tip, was driving Triton mad. Triton stroked her trembling, plump thighs, which were straining with effort.

Fear, to fear something like this.

He chuckled at the absurdity of the situation but refrained from forcing himself in, knowing it might provoke her into biting her own tongue.

Gently, he pulled Livia onto his lap, allowing her to settle softly over his manhood. Feeling her soft skin against him tempted him to thrust inside her, but he exercised considerable patience and held back.

Instead, he gently grasped Livia’s chin, parted her lips, and softly slid his tongue inside.

He explored her mouth, which was as rigid as stone, probing deeply with his tongue. Startled, she dug her nails into Triton’s shoulders, scratching at his unyielding skin as she endured the unfamiliar sensation.

How admirable.

As if praising her, he kneaded Livia’s buttocks while gently rubbing his shaft against her parted folds and clitoris. Despite her attempts to resist, heated breaths began to escape from her lips. It was endearing how her body responded to the pleasure he provided, even as she remained cautious.

Her mind might have been determined to resist, but her body was quite receptive, relaxing with each wave of sensation. He wanted to push in fully, but forcing it might break her spirit.

In that case…

While sucking on Livia’s tongue, Triton suddenly placed a small pearl on top of it.

The small, trembling movements of her body stopped abruptly. Her once-dazed eyes regained focus. Her green eyes, shifting in intensity, looked at him in surprise.

With a playful smile, he slowly pulled back and whispered as he licked her parted lower lip.

“No need to thank me, Livia.”

If he couldn’t devour her, he would make her offer herself willingly. With gentle coaxing, he would lead her to come to him on her own.

A small storm brewed in Triton’s gleaming eyes as he gazed at Livia.



The pearl settled deep in her throat. Even without speaking, she knew her voice had returned. The places the pearl touched felt as if they were on fire.

What exactly was a ‘trial’?

Livia lay on the cool bed like a stone, pressing her hot neck as she pondered.

Challenges, obstacles, crises…

Those words came to mind. She could confidently say that she was still going through a trial.

“If you want to fully regain your voice, it’s best not to leave this bed until you fall asleep.”

Though she couldn’t see him, she felt the heavy presence of a man behind her. Without turning her head, Livia cautiously shifted her eyes.

There was no sound or movement, but her back tingled. The excessive silence seemed to heighten her senses to an extreme.

…It was torture. Truly torturous.

Livia bit the inside of her lip, suppressing her erratic breathing. Her tongue, swollen from being bitten and sucked, awkwardly moved around in her mouth.

‘This is… strange.’


This was really strange, no matter how much she thought about it. With narrowed eyes, Livia stared into the void.

She was already familiar with the gods’ debauchery, so there was nothing surprising about it. In fact, she had somewhat prepared myself for it since he first laid hands on her. But what Livia found odd wasn’t that part.

“You don’t need to thank me, Livia.”

In fact, she found it strange that he stopped there.

He was a man who could take whatever he wanted. Wasn’t he someone who stood far above mere human kings?

The god was the ruler of beings beyond humans. Was that all? He even held the ‘right’ to torment Livia, just as Livia had the right to attack Triton.

But why? What kind of scheme was he hiding? What was he trying to disrupt within her?

Every action of the sea god left her bewildered. After such a kiss, he calmly laid her down beside him…

‘…A kiss?’

Startled by the word that popped into her mind, Livia hurriedly denied it.

No, no. That wasn’t a kiss.

How could such an act be considered a kiss? It was merely harassment. It was just Triton playing a cruel prank on her.

Livia recalled what had prodded between her legs. How shocked she had been when something hard and thick, as if it would pierce through her at any moment, poked at her entrance…

‘How could such a thing…’

She had heard stories of humans and gods making love, but now that she thought about it, they all seemed like lies. Humans couldn’t accommodate such things.

It might have been because she lacked experience. Although she grew up with male siblings, they were always so proper that they never showed Livia anything inappropriate. So she might have been more ignorant because of that, but no matter how much she thought about it, it was… it was not something a human could take in.

To thrust something akin to a blunt weapon at me. Truly an insane god.

The rumors of gods being promiscuous seemed all too true. He would readily erect his manhood and shamelessly thrust that desire upon Livia.

So she must not be swayed. Such acts meant nothing to promiscuous gods.

Hadn’t she been discarding human things one by one since she turned her back on life and embarked on a path of revenge? Purity and passion were no exception. It was a body she didn’t care if it rolled and broke until it became rags, so there was no reason to shrink from mere intercourse or coupling.

“Humans… are you embarrassed by this, Livia?”

No, not at all.

Not at all.

Livia closed her eyes, which had been glaring.

Completely unaware of how the blue light behind her was gazing at her.



“Hurry up!”

The voice piercing her ears made Livia’s eyes snap open. But she saw nothing. Only pitch-black darkness filled her vision.

What was this…? A dream?

Lying on her side with her arm as a pillow, Livia stayed still, assessing the situation. At that moment, with a splashing sound, the floor began to sway. Simultaneously, murmuring voices flooded her previously muffled ears.

…Voices of people?

Livia sprang up.

The splashing water sound intensified, and the rocking of the floor became more pronounced.

It didn’t feel like a dream; unlike being underwater, her body felt heavy. It was the very weight she felt when coming ashore.

Turning her head, she saw a thin line of light on one side of what she thought was complete darkness. It was a crack in the door.

She crawled on her knees toward the crack. Pressing her ear against the wooden door, the sounds outside became clearer.

Why am I here? I fell asleep in his chamber…

Blinking in confusion, a firefly-like light rose from beneath where Livia lay. It swirled around the spot a few times as if dancing, then formed letters.

“In this third trial, what will you gain, and what will you lose?”

It was his doing. The words “third trial” made all the awkward and bewildering things clear. She clung to the wooden door, tense.

What new torment awaited her outside this door? She was afraid, but she didn’t hesitate. After taking a short deep breath, she slowly opened the door.



“Sis, sister… what’s going to happen to us?”

Hearing the cries of a child smaller than herself, the girl bit her lip and stared beyond the bars. Men were running around busily, firing flaming arrows at the ship pursuing the kidnapped children.

…Even to a young girl, the situation seemed hopeless.

The child was only eight years old, and her younger sibling was just six. There wasn’t much she could say. All she could do was hold back her tears, but she hugged her sibling’s shoulder and tried to reassure them.

“What do you mean what’s going to happen? Dad will come to rescue us. Don’t you know how brave the men are? It’s fine. We’ll all be saved.”

Although the girl’s words were a lie, they carried hope. Because of this, a few of the other kidnapped children sighed with relief, clinging to the false hope. It was a boy named Roak, who had helped in their kidnapping, that shattered that hope.

“That’s funny. You’re all as good as dead now. Do you really think those people will return you to the island?”

The girl, Nadis, who was hugging her sibling, glared at Roak.

Roak, who had lured the children out by suggesting they play with fire, was the troublemaker of the island. His mother had died right after he was born, and he was raised by a drunken fisherman father, causing trouble everywhere as if there was no tomorrow.

After his father fell off a cliff and died a few months ago, the village chief took care of him, but there was no hope for reforming Roak. Eventually, he even lured the children out at night and sold them to pirates.

“Why on earth did you do this?”

“Why did I do this? Ask that old man in the village chief’s place when you’re dead! It’s all because he tried to send me off the island!”

The boy laughed harshly and banged on the iron bars. According to the original plan, he was supposed to escape, but he seemed resentful that he was caught along with them.

“You scoundrel!”

“How could you…?”

“Mom, Dad…!”

“Waaah!”

Finally, the children who had been holding back their tears burst into sobs. As about a dozen children cried out together, a short pirate at the front of the deck ran over and banged on the iron bars with a club.

“If you don’t shut up, I’ll throw you into the sea one by one!”

“Eek!”

“Hic… hic…”

The pirate, who was panting, ran back to the stern at the captain’s call. The frightened children clamped their mouths shut and trembled. Some even wet themselves.

“Sis, sis…”

Nadis, holding her sibling, felt her hands trembling too. She gritted her teeth to endure it, but she was just as scared. Clenching her teeth and holding back her tears, Nadis grasped her sibling’s hand tightly and whispered.

“It’s okay… The god of the sea will protect us.”

Her eyes, gazing at the black sea, were desperate.

“Nonsense.”

Roak, trembling in the corner, spat out curses as if to vent his frustrations, but the girl remained unshaken. She was young and innocent, and her belief was absolute because of that innocence.

Then it happened.

“Intruder!”

A sharp cry echoed across the deck.



What kind of trial is this?

When she stepped outside, there was only the black, rolling night sea. There was no stench of rotten flesh, no leeches gnawing at flesh and bones, just the black sea.

Livia looked around with a bewildered expression. She was on a large ship with a massive sail. From the loud shouts echoing below the swaying deck, it seemed to be a galley rowed by many people.

The place where she had awakened appeared to be a small storeroom at the stern. The noise was coming from the central deck. Livia cautiously peeked around the stern, hiding herself. She saw men in pairs, cursing loudly as they fired flaming longbows.

“Damn it! The wind is too strong!”

“Shit, this isn’t just a headwind or a whirlwind, why is the wind acting up like this?”

“Don’t stop shooting! They’re catching up to us!”

The galley seemed to be fleeing frantically as if being pursued. They were firing flaming arrows backward, but the wind kept them from traveling far, causing them to plunge into the sea. In contrast, the arrows fired from behind were landing dangerously close to the galley.

“Captain, at this rate, we’ll suffer more damage!”

“We already lost one ship; we can’t afford to lose more here!”

“Ah, those persistent island Damns!”

The captain spat on the floor and then gulped down the liquor from the bottle he was holding.

He staggered as if he were drunk, then quickly shoved his subordinates aside and stood in front of the longbow.

“Move, move! You’re so weak, you can’t even hit a single target!”

The one they called the captain seized the longbow that two men had been struggling to manage. As soon as they swiftly set a flaming arrow, the captain drew the string with tremendous force.

He didn’t take long to aim.

With a resounding bang, the arrow shot out and struck the pursuing ship with precision.

“Wow! Just as expected from our captain!”

“Wow! Your skills haven’t rusted a bit, have they?”

Livia watched the men cheering and celebrating with curious eyes. Were they pirates? If so, was her trial to eliminate these pirates? Yet, it seemed strange for Triton to be interested in such trivial matters.

Of course, Triton hated pirates. She knew he occasionally wiped them out for amusement. She had witnessed it herself.

However, she also knew that the pirate ships he usually targeted were larger and more vicious than this one. Why would he target a mediocre galley carrying only a few dozen people and speeding away?

“Lower the sails and tell the rowers to speed up! If they catch up, we’ll throw the captured kids into the sea one by one!”

At the captain’s command, a short subordinate with an eye patch quickly clung to the captain’s feet to stop him.

“No, you can’t do that! Do you know how much money we can make by selling them? There’s a slave trader who takes kids, and these kids look like they’ve been well-fed and raised, so they’ll fetch a good price!”

“Y-yes, and didn’t the island witch say not to get rid of the kids? She said the sea god won’t touch the ship with kids on board!”

“What witch? That old hag isn’t a witch! Damn it. If it weren’t for that cursed Kraken…”

The captain, who had been spouting foul words, finished off the bottle he was holding. Just as he was about to grab the longbow again, a sorrowful wail came from somewhere, causing the arrow to miss its mark.

“Those brats…!”

As the captain turned around with a menacing look, the pirate with the eye patch, who had tried to stop him from selling the children, ran toward the kids. Livia, who had been secretly watching from behind, quickly ducked down in surprise.

“If you don’t keep quiet, I’ll throw you to the sharks one by one!”

At the man’s harsh threat, the children immediately fell silent.

With a stern face, Livia stared at the children trapped inside the iron cage. The massive cage, seemingly meant for holding beasts, was stained with foul filth and Blood. Around the cage, sharp harpoons and broken nets were scattered messily.

‘Kidnapping…’

Having roughly grasped the situation, Livia cautiously surveyed her surroundings. In any case, she had encountered her third trial on this ship and had to overcome the challenges she faced.

Dealing with the pirates was one issue, but the bigger problem was whether she could safely rescue the children trapped in the cage.

Whether it was due to the power of the sea god or the witch’s magic, Livia had some freedom at sea, but the children did not. Besides, it wasn’t possible for her to swim to the island with all the children in tow…

What should she do? What would be the right thing to do?

As she pondered, a small scream came from below the railing.

“Row properly! Don’t you know if one person gets tangled, everyone does?”

“Something’s caught!”

The voices of the rowers, raised in argument, reached her ears. As Livia glanced in that direction, her eyes narrowed. Wondering if she had seen something wrong, she moved closer to the railing, but then someone grabbed her wrist.

“Who are you? I’ve never seen you before!”

…She’d been caught.

“Hey, there’s a suspicious woman here… Ugh!”

Taking advantage of the moment when the man turned his head, Livia swiftly kicked him in the groin. The kick, delivered with all her might, was effective, as the man collapsed forward, unable to breathe properly. However, the voices of other pirates who had heard him quickly turned their attention to her. The pirates, having noticed her presence, began to converge on her.

“Intruder!”

Though momentarily flustered by the sudden rush of pirates, Livia soon regained her composure. She was standing in a narrow alley beside the central deck. Even if they rushed at her all at once, they would have to line up. Livia swiftly drew a golden dagger from her wrist. Striking the wrist of the first man who lunged at her, she decisively slashed him with the dagger.

“Argh!”

Another pirate came flying at her from behind the fallen man. She quickly dodged to the side and stabbed him in the flank with her dagger.

“That Damn woman!”

However, her luck was hindered by another pirate who attacked her from behind. Though restrained by the arms that grabbed her, she kicked at the approaching man once more.

She had managed to deal with only about five or six pirates. As she was pushed back, still restrained, about a dozen more pirates surrounded her.

“Look at this audacious woman! Where did you come from? Did you stow away on the ship from the beginning?”

When Livia didn’t respond and simply glared at them, the pirates erupted into laughter. Some of them smacked their lips and brazenly grabbed their crotches, shaking them.

“Wow, she’s quite a tasty-looking one. Is this what they call a sweet potato that fell right into our laps?”

“You idiot! Sweet potatoes don’t have vines! It’s yams!”

“Oh, right, yams! A yam that fell right in with the vines! Oh, so sweet!”

The pirates exchanged clumsy jokes, baring their yellowed teeth. The pirate holding Livia pressed his body against her back, squeezing her chest with his hand.

“Wow, her chest is so firm…”

“What are you doing? Get out of the way! Are you trying to feast without the captain?”

Pushing through the gathered pirates, the captain from the stern came running. He had seemed quite large even from a distance, but up close, his bulk was extraordinary. He was almost as massive as Triton, the largest man she had ever seen.

“What’s this? An island girl? When did she get on board?”

Livia quietly watched the man approaching her. Perhaps due to his experience, the captain sensed something strange in her unafraid expression.

“…This girl seems odd.”

As he stopped abruptly and furrowed his brows, another pirate hovering nearby chimed in.

“Odd? If she’s odd, should I taste her first?”

“Hey, you Bastard. What are you saying? Odd is odd, and tasting is tasting! Get lost!”

“Shouldn’t the captain just stick to shooting arrows? Why are you here?”

“I came because it was worth coming, you Damns! Why are you showing your desperation?”

If the captain hadn’t been drunk, he might have been more perceptive. Unfortunately, his brain was already soaked in alcohol, making it slow to function. Ignoring his instincts, the captain fumbled to open his pants. His half-erect manhood sprang out.

The pirates all cheered and whistled, eagerly anticipating the brutal and merciless act that was about to follow.

“How about it? Isn’t my little one quite fierce? You’ve never seen anything like this before!”

Livia stared unblinkingly at the man’s exposed crotch. It was disgusting to look at, but she didn’t feel the need to express her revulsion.

With an expressionless face, she continued to watch him, then looked the captain straight in the eye. A clear sneer played on her twisted lips.

“Pathetic little thing.”

A brief silence passed. The captain’s jovial grin twitched and froze.

“You bitch…!”

The captain, his eyes reddened, lunged at Livia. At that moment, Livia’s lips moved slightly.

“Mumu.”

She merely called the name, but the hellhound appeared as if it had been waiting, emerging with ashen smoke. Mumu, now twice the size since she last saw it, stood protectively in front of Livia.

Grrrr!

The three-headed dog lunged at the captain without hesitation. The captain screamed as Mumu bit into his neck, but the startled crew quickly backed away.

“A m-monster!”

“Ahhh!”

“Run away!”

The pirates scattered like a disorganized mob. Livia glanced at Mumu, who was breathing fire at them, and quickly made her way toward the children.

‘Mumu has grown so much.’

She marveled at how terrifying growth spurts could be and hurried her steps. As expected, amidst the chaos, none of the pirates paid any attention to the children.

“Kids, come out quickly.”

“Wh-who are you?”

Livia looked at the lock on the iron cage with annoyance and quickly scanned the area. She spotted a few harpoons carelessly tossed on the ground. Selecting the heaviest and sturdiest-looking one, she smashed it against the lock.

Bang!

The lock broke off easily. Livia opened the cage door, but the frightened children hesitated to come out.

“What are you doing? I said come out! You were kidnapped from your island, right?”

“Who are you?”

“I am…”

Her tongue froze, unsure of what to say. At that moment, one of the pirates who had been running around noticed Livia and charged at her.

“You, you… you bitch…!”

Judging by how well he had dodged earlier, he seemed like a man who knew how to handle himself. With bloodshot eyes, he grabbed Livia by the collar, brandishing a crescent-shaped blade.

“So, you are from the island! Hurry, stop that dog!”

She felt herself being lifted off the ground by the man’s strength. Strangely, she didn’t feel afraid. Was it because she fought sharks and non-humans every day? Or was it because she wasn’t an ordinary human anymore?

“…No, I won’t.”

“You bitch!”

The man threatened her neck with his dirty blade. But soon, his eyes widened in shock as no matter how much he stabbed, not a single mark was left on her neck.

“What, what is this?”

“Why? Want to try stabbing more? Or how about cutting my neck?”

Livia whispered softly in the man’s ear with a crooked smile.

“It won’t cut, though.”

“Ah, ahh! What, what is this? Who are you?”

The man, his face turning pale, fell back with a scream. Mumu, realizing Livia’s situation, rushed over and bit the man’s neck.

“Ah, ugh…!”

As the trembling body went limp, Mumu spat the man out. Gray smoke seeped out with each heavy breath. Livia gently patted Mumu, who had grown to her height.

“Thank you, Mumu.”

Woof!

All three heads responded in unison and then vanished. Smiling softly at the empty space where Mumu had disappeared, Livia turned to the children still standing frozen in the cage.

“Are you going to stay there? We can’t return on this ship. We need to escape before it gets any further away.”

Despite Livia’s words, fear still lingered on the children’s faces. The smallest boy suddenly stood up, pulling along his sister who was hugging him.

“Let’s go, sis! Come on.”

“Rudy.”

“You said God would save us, remember? That lady is a messenger sent by God, right?”

Livia was taken aback by the boy’s words but nodded soon after. Well, it wasn’t entirely wrong. The god of the sea had pushed her here, telling her to overcome the trials… It seemed best to let the children believe what they wanted.

“See! Let’s go!”

Urged by the boy called Rudy, the girl briefly looked at Livia. Livia simply met her gaze calmly. Whatever the girl saw in Livia’s eyes, she suddenly stood up, holding her brother’s hand.

“Let’s go, Rudy. You’re right.”

“See? Come on, sis. Everyone, follow us.”

Encouraged by Rudy, the other children hesitantly followed. The last to step out of the cage was a boy who had been frowning in disbelief. Once outside, the children looked at the dark sea with fear and asked cautiously.

“But if we can’t go back on this ship, how will we get back?”

In response, Livia looked down over the ship’s railing. After quietly observing the darkness, she smiled at the child.

“Smart kid, can you trust me?”

The boy nodded vigorously. Was it because he was young? His innocent eyes were filled with trust. Somehow, he reminded her of Lete’s childhood. Without realizing it, Livia patted the boy gently.

The child nodded vigorously. Perhaps it was because he was young; his innocent eyes were filled with trust, reminding Livia of Lete’s childhood. Without realizing it, Livia gently patted the boy’s hair and nodded.

“Follow me, okay?”

Rudy nodded and glanced back at his sister. His sister, Nadis, nodded as well and looked at Livia.

Leaving the children behind, Livia climbed onto the railing. Without hesitation, she jumped into the sea, causing the children to rush to the railing in surprise.

“Gosh! Did she really fall?”

“What do we do? She fell in!”

“It’s so dark, we can’t see anything.”

Roak, who had followed the children out, muttered as if he had expected this.

“I knew it. A messenger of the gods, my foot….”

“Shh. Be quiet.”

Nadis covered Roak’s mouth with her hand. Just as Roak’s face was about to twist into an even more unpleasant expression,

Splash!

A sound came from below the sea. The children’s faces, pressed against the railing, were filled with astonishment.

Watching the scene, Nadia whispered in a trembling voice.

“…She is, she really is a messenger of the sea god.”

A woman riding on the back of a black shark turned to look at the children. Around her, white, beautiful sharks circled gracefully.

It was a strange, very strange sight.



Livia, who had been looking below the railing, spotted sharks circling the ship. Whether they were there to watch or simply observe, it was fortunate to have found them.

Since the ship had traveled far from the island, it would have been difficult to return using an ordinary boat. The vast, dark sea was perfect for getting lost.

The sharks knew the sea well and were large enough to carry the children. The only question was whether the sharks would listen to her….

However, as soon as she entered the water and encountered the sharks, the black shark approached first.

She wondered if she would have to deal with this one again, but the shark seemed to be waiting for her and allowed her to climb onto its back. Soon after, the white shark joined the black shark, calmly waiting for the children above the water.

It was as if they already knew Livia’s intentions.

It was a peculiar thing.

Livia helped the children onto each shark’s back. Since sharks were creatures to be feared, some children were scared, but when Nadis and Rudy took the lead, the rest followed.

Riding on the black shark’s back, Livia glanced down. After having its teeth removed, the black shark no longer showed hostility toward her.

Though it circled around her constantly, it felt different from before.

Thinking back, during the time with Dionysus, it had suddenly appeared and thrown a leopard. Back then, she hadn’t thought it was helping her, but….

‘Maybe it was helping after all.’

After some hesitation, Livia cautiously patted the shark’s forehead. She could feel the shark’s skin flinch noticeably as it swam powerfully against the waves.

She thought that the skin of sharks and whales was thick and wouldn’t feel such a gesture, but perhaps it was more sensitive than she thought? Or was this shark special? Whatever it was, she hoped her warmth reached the shark. She also felt sorry for having chased it away with stones last time….

“It’s the island!”

One of the children riding the white shark shouted joyfully. The children all lifted their heads, gazing at the small island with steep cliffs.

Just as the child said, the island was close.



When they reached the vicinity of the island, the children jumped off the sharks’ backs and swam to the beach on their own.

Nadis carried her brother, who wasn’t good at swimming, on her back. Rudy clung tightly to her, whispering anxiously.

“Is Roak really not coming?”

Roak.

He had tried to lure the children and sell them to the pirates, so he wouldn’t escape punishment even if he returned to the island. He probably wouldn’t be able to live on the island anymore.

Roak seemed to think the same. He must have judged that it was better to leave the island on his own if he was going to be expelled anyway. So, the boy refused to jump off the pirate ship with the other children, saying he’d rather become a pirate than return to the island and face hardship.

No one stopped Roak. They left him behind, as if telling him to do as he pleased, and climbed onto the sharks’ backs. Only the young Rudy looked back at Roak several times.

“He won’t come, probably. Never again….”

The clever girl could easily foresee what the future held for the reckless boy, but she chose not to explain it to her younger brother. The best she could do was press her lips tightly, silently urging him to forget about it.

“Thank you, thank you so much…!”

The children, having reached the shore, hurriedly expressed their gratitude to Livia and ran toward the village. Even as their feet sank into the sand, causing them to stumble, they continued to run frantically. Their desperate sprint revealed just how frightened and terrified they had been.

Most of the children left the beach. The last to remain was Nadis, a girl holding tightly onto her younger brother’s hand.

“Um…”

Approaching Livia, the girl spoke cautiously.

“You were sent by ‘him,’ weren’t you?”

Him?

Not knowing whom she referred to, Livia looked down at the girl, who raised her hand to point somewhere.

“I’ve seen him come here before. To his temple.”

Livia glanced in the direction the girl pointed. She could see a steep cliff, but the night goddess had draped her long, dark skirt too far to see any temple.

“The adults were too busy protecting the island. Many died, and many were injured. So, I thought at least we should take care of Triton’s temple. My late mother always said not to forget the lord of the island and the sea.”

The girl’s words shook Livia. Without reading Livia’s expression, the girl bowed her head along with her brother.

“Thank you for saving us. Truly.”

“Thank you…!”

The children bowed several times to Livia, then belatedly ran in the direction where the other children had disappeared.

Livia stood stiffly, staring blankly at the siblings’ retreating figures before slowly turning her head. Confusion spread across her face as she gazed up at the cliff.



For several days, the moon had hidden behind clouds, refusing to show itself. As a result, the waves crashed even more violently, and at night, the sea became darker and more forbidding than the underworld.

Yet, just because the sea was unpleasant to look at didn’t mean one could hide forever.

If the sun rising during the day was natural, then the moon had to shine upon the earth at night.

Triton stood on the cliff, looking down at the black sea with an expressionless face. From afar, the sea appeared endlessly calm, but within those deep, dark waters flowed countless stories of life.

Those who committed evil under the cover of darkness and those who sought forbidden love away from prying eyes.

And the witch, who curled herself up like a worm in the shadows, plotting revenge.

It won’t go your way, Echidna.

In the sea, there was nothing Triton couldn’t find. No matter how cleverly one disguised themselves like an octopus or lay flat on the sandy bottom like a stingray.

What would he do once he found her?

First, he would sever the link of the contract made with Livia. After completely ending that ridiculous spell, he would keep that amusing woman entirely for his own enjoyment.

Purely his own, without the interference of someone like Echidna….

Triton’s lips curled into a smile. With his hands clasped behind his back, he gently rolled the red fruit he held in his palm, waiting for the presence he had been expecting.



The man stood alone on the wind-swept hill.

A pitch-black night without moonlight.

The man, like a solitary shining star, turned to look at Livia, radiating a beauty like polished brilliance. His broad shoulders and firm chest, devoid of moisture, felt unfamiliar.

The soft light flowing over his smooth skin was dizzying, and Livia gritted her teeth and lowered her gaze.

If she wasn’t careful, she would be captivated. That man was the sea itself, and if she fell in, she would sink deeply without a trace. So she had to stay alert.

Like the sea, which could be serene under the sun but turned fierce by nightfall, getting caught up in Triton’s unpredictable whims would surely lead to drowning without leaving anything behind.

“What exactly are you planning?”

Livia asked, stopping neither too far nor too close to him. He tilted his head, silently watching her. With no moonlight, his silver-blue hair, which seemed to glow on its own, rippled like waves over his muscular shoulders.

Silence divided them. The only sound filling the space was the urgent beating of Livia’s heart.

“Come closer.”

In that moment, his call to approach him frightened her more than when he tried to break, humiliate, or shatter her.

“Livia, come here.”

She wanted to shout at him to stop calling her name in that voice. That cunning and shameless god always toyed with and teased her using that soft tone. Livia shook her head in refusal.

“What do you think you’ll discover by staying away?”

“If you would just say…”

“Humans are always like that. They act as if they’ve entrusted something to a god, demanding what they want with such arrogance.”



“Come closer, Livia.”

As if issuing a final warning, Triton’s voice lowered. The moment Livia, who had been biting the inside of her cheek to endure, hesitated and took a step, an invisible force snatched her waist and pulled her forward.

Startled and stiffened with shock, a red fruit slipped into Livia’s mouth. The sweet and sour aroma of the fruit made her eyes widen, and Triton chuckled softly.

“Raspberry…?”

“It’s the fruit some siblings tirelessly offer at the altar. Thanks to them, I’ve eaten more than enough.”

The siblings Triton mentioned were undoubtedly Nadis and Rudy. The memory of the girl who claimed to have seen Triton came to mind.

“Offering raspberries to the sea god. Isn’t it amusing? Usually, they throw live animals into the sea, or some humans even offer other humans…”

As Livia’s expression hardened at his words, Triton laughed and pushed another raspberry into her mouth.

“These are the living sacrifices I never asked for.”

“…You dislike humans.”

“To be precise, I despise them.”

Triton didn’t deny it. His shadowed eyes gazed at Livia. Unlike his lips, which spoke of hatred, the look in his eyes revealed a stark, raw desire.

“You have to despise what’s despicable. You’ve seen it too.”

Images of the pirates who kidnapped children flashed through her mind. And before that, there were other pirates who massacred the sirens.

Livia wanted to argue. She wanted to say those were just a few, the actions of some pirates, but she couldn’t bring herself to speak.

How many humans could the sea god see? The island’s residents, merchants, navy, or pirates.

Among them, how many crossed the sea without causing trouble? Soldiers boarding ships for war, pirates roaming the seas to plunder other ships, some trading ships, and fishing boats.

The sea god despised humans.

…But did he truly despise all humans?

The sea god hadn’t crossed onto land to massacre humans. He hadn’t swallowed every human wandering the sea into its depths.

But who feared him? Wasn’t it those who roamed, drifted, and stirred the sea, engaging in plunder and invasion?

…Livia didn’t know. Maybe not. Perhaps he sank human ships as he pleased. Among those who provoked his wrath, many were pirates, but there must have been innocent people too.

However, the same could be said for storms, droughts, and floods.

So how can one say that only the sea god despises humans? Perhaps he simply wanted to maintain peace in the sea…

‘No, let’s stop here.’

The deeper her thoughts went, the more Livia realized she was somehow trying to understand him.

There was no need for this. Such thoughts weren’t important to her at all.

Livia gazed at Triton with confused eyes. His blue eyes seemed to swallow her whole.


“This island had been mine since the beginning of time.”

Triton suddenly pulled Livia close, wrapping an arm around her waist. She felt his cool hand through the thin, damp fabric of her clothes. His fingers, which had been tracing the clinging fabric, slipped inside through the gap in her clothing.

“One day, humans settled here without permission, but their demeanor was respectful, so I let them be. Realizing it was my island, they built altars and temples to seek my consent. Seeing them go to such lengths, I decided there was no need to drive them away.”

As his fingertip glided over her bare waist, a shiver ran down her spine. Her breath threatened to escape through her clenched teeth.

Startled, she tried to pull back, but Triton held her tightly and whispered.

“I know that not all humans are rude and greedy.”

The moon, hidden behind thick clouds, slowly peeked out. A few strands of moonlight slipped through the clouds and glimmered on her hair.

Was the goddess watching them? Did he not care if the goddess saw them like this? A fog of confusion clouded Livia’s mind. She felt strange.

Weren’t they in a special relationship?

The memory of that day when he seemed to be arguing with the goddess flashed by. Though she couldn’t hear their voices, the goddess was clearly angry. Yet Triton showed no signs of agitation.

In fact, after the goddess left, hadn’t he calmly pleasured himself, even knowing Livia was watching?

Recalling that shocking scene, she couldn’t bear to meet Triton’s eyes. When Livia quickly turned her head, his hand followed, gently grasping her chin to make her face him.

“Some humans are wise, some are innocent, and some love their families so much that they willingly walk into hell.”

The moonlight illuminated his face, as if to announce its presence.

“This island is mine, and everything born and raised here belongs to me. Those children were also born on this island. I was merely protecting what is mine…”

Yet Triton seemed utterly unconcerned as he pulled Livia even closer and whispered.

Could a voice have shadows? Somehow, his deep, low voice seemed to cast a shadow, leaving Livia feeling dizzy.

By now, what she had only vaguely suspected became entirely clear.

Ah, this sea god wasn’t just toying with her; he was trying to seduce her. He seemed determined to play with her thoroughly.

If that was the case, she needed to stay alert.

Someone once said that a mermaid’s song has the power to drive humans mad.

Livia recalled his true form. So immense and majestic that it was impossible to take in at a glance, his scales glittering as if adorned with countless treasures.

“Livia.”

That leisurely, flowing voice, like a song, definitely held the power of a mermaid. She had to struggle not to be swayed by that deceitfully gentle voice.

“…What kind of trial is this?”

She bit her lower lip and glared sharply at Triton.

“This isn’t a trial. I’d rather… I’d rather be torn apart by disgusting insects all over my body than endure this strange trial.”

“What’s so strange about it?”

“I wasn’t hurt at all. It didn’t even hurt! This was too easy to be called a trial…!”

“But it’s confusing, isn’t it?”

His words silenced her.

“It must be quite uncomfortable, irritating, and distressing.”

Her breath caught in her throat. His relaxed smile was annoying, but she couldn’t think of anything to counter it.

“Isn’t that what a true trial is?”

His soft voice whispered in her ear, leaving her no choice but to listen. Even with laughter mixed in, his voice sounded charming. Her pounding heart felt uncomfortable. Livia glared at him with reddened eyes.

“…Give me another trial. Like the first one you gave, just something dreadful and disgusting.”

“To think you’re in a position to receive trials and yet you’re making demands. How audacious.”

Despite his words, he continued to smile. Suddenly, he reached out and brushed her lips. Red juice stained his pale fingertips.

Watching his fingers, he licked them with his tongue, savoring the tart juice, completely ignoring her embarrassed expression. He whispered cheerfully.

“Fine. I’ll choose the next trial to suit your taste.”



Triton kept his promise.

Without giving Livia a moment to recover, he thrust her into a new ordeal. Surprisingly, Livia felt somewhat relieved. The more she encountered Triton, the more something within her subtly trembled.

It was a barely perceptible vibration, but she sensed that if left unchecked, something significant might occur. His mischievous smile and unnecessarily kind tone were too dangerous to keep close….

“Livia, Livia….”

Every time Triton called her name like that, a chill ran down Livia’s spine. It felt as if his enchanting voice was consuming her. So, this was preferable.

Being cast into a bone-chilling cold and a darkness so profound that calling it black wasn’t sufficient.

“…Someone, come out. Come out!”

Livia shouted into the darkness. It seemed better to close her eyes and see nothing than to stare into a void where nothing was visible.

No matter how much she yelled, no response came. It was so cold that her teeth chattered painfully. With nothing to cover herself or hide behind, she endured the cold with her bare body, holding out against time.

She felt the sensation in her hands and feet fading. Even though there was no wind, why was it so piercingly cold?

It was cold. So cold. And worse than that was the darkness that seemed to devour all light.

Livia slowly opened her eyes. She opened them to escape the darkness, but what lay ahead was still darkness. No, it was an even more dreadful darkness than when her eyes were closed. The mind she thought was okay became less okay as time went on.

…Why is no one here? Why can’t I see anything? How long, just how long do I have to stay here…?

She tried running to find an invisible wall and scratched the floor with her nails. She screamed until her voice was hoarse, but nothing came back.

Could it be that she had already arrived in hell? Was this the very hell within hell?

Livia shivered, crouched down. All her senses faded into a distant blur. More terrible than breaking bones, bleeding, or feeling like dying of hunger was this moment, right now.

With her eyes tightly shut, she thought of those she missed.

Dad, Iason, Lete.
Ah, Mumu.

Yes, our Mumu.

Mumu….


…Would she never see them again like this? No, the truth was they were already dead, so it was only natural not to meet them again. Meeting Mumu had been a stroke of luck, but she shouldn’t expect such fortune with the rest of her family.

Dad, who had met Mother again, Iason, who would be a ferryman in the underworld, and Lete. Lete, who was captured by the witch.

Lete….

“Sniff.”

Livia rubbed her tears away with the back of her hand, then crawled on the floor with her barely moving hands and feet. She crawled and crawled, fumbling to find anything, pleading to be let out of there.

To end this ordeal, she begged to be told what to do.

Please tell me what exactly I need to do, please.

Please!!!

“Triton!”

At that moment.

With a pop, the darkness shattered.

Livia must have fainted without even realizing it. When she regained consciousness, a bright white light greeted her. The sudden burst of light into the once pitch-black darkness made her eyes feel like they were burning.

“Ugh…!”

Startled, Livia tightly shut her eyes and covered her face with both arms, lying flat on the ground. Something rough slipped between her lips as she gasped for breath.

What is this?

She squinted her eyes open and looked at the ground, which was covered in sand. The grains of sand seeping between her fingers were not just warm but hot.

Once her eyes adjusted to the light, she looked around. Everywhere she looked, it seemed like a vast expanse of sandy desert.

From the sea to a desert all of a sudden? How…?

Feeling bewildered, Livia scanned her surroundings and soon gave up trying to understand what was happening. She plunged her hands into the sand. The warm sand thawed her frozen body. Unable to resist, she lay down on the sand. But she couldn’t stay there long.

As the hot sand touched her skin, which had thawed from being frozen, a prickling pain spread across her body. A dry wind blew. As it brushed against the fine hairs on her arms, goosebumps rose.

Frozen and then thawed. They’re really trying to kill me here….

Still, it wasn’t the blinding darkness or the freezing cold, so she wondered where she was. Livia lifted her weary body and looked for a place to rest.

Watching the sand scatter, she felt inexplicably thirsty. At that moment, a chilling premonition struck her.

‘Could it be… am I going to be stuck here without a single drop of water?’

With a fearful expression, Livia looked around the desert, which was nothing but sand.

No one answered her.



Damn premonition. It’s never wrong.

Livia trudged through the dry desert, cursing Triton with every step. It felt familiar. She had walked endlessly, cursing that man once before….

Ah, right. The underworld.

Back then, too, she had kept cursing the man who had driven her to the brink.

No matter if he was a god…. How long did she have to suffer like this? Just wait, someday she’ll get back at him.

I swear, I’ll stab that heart of his with a dagger.

Finally, Livia reached a cave. A cool breeze blew from inside. She sensed some moisture but hesitated to venture into the darkness.

Who knew darkness could be so terrifying….

Livia wasn’t easily frightened. To be honest, she had rarely feared anything. She had worried about others but had never shied away from something out of fear.

But now, she was afraid of the darkness. She hesitated, fearing she might be trapped in it again.

At that moment, she realized.

Perhaps what’s scarier than death is the inability to die, longing for death eternally….

Swallowing hard, Livia glared at the darkness, then sat down in front of the cave.

Since it had been a while since the sun set, she thought it would be better to wait at the cave entrance until sunrise.

Once daylight came, she planned to explore inside. Even though she felt like she might die of thirst, she didn’t want to go in just yet. Leaning against the hard rock, she rested her forehead on her knees.

Sitting idly, hunger crept in. She craved the warm, savory goat milk soup Iason used to make.

Though he was only two years older, Iason had taken care of Livia like their father. Persephone had said Iason became a ferryman following Charon. Why was that? A ferryman wandering the underworld….

On the other hand, since Iason loved boats, she thought it might not be all bad. He had said he wanted to sail every ship in the world, and now he was sailing ships beyond the world.

Thinking of Iason, Livia chuckled softly, rubbing her eyes to stay awake despite the drowsiness. Fortunately, thanks to the brilliant starlight, it wasn’t too dark even at night.

Where on earth is this place? What kind of trial is this now….

Damn Triton….

She had a feeling he was watching from somewhere. The darkness that shattered the moment she called his name…. There must have been some intention behind it.

What do you want from me?

Something had definitely changed from when he first inflicted pain on her. It seemed like he wanted her to feel and think about something.

“But it’s confusing.”

“Somewhere, it’s very uncomfortable, frustrating, and painful.”

As much as she didn’t want to admit it, he was right.

The trials Livia faced now were making her confused and uncomfortable. She didn’t want to think about anything, just wanted to focus on revenge and move forward….

As if trying to ignore reality, Livia strained her eyes to stare at the sky, fighting off the sleepiness.

But as if the inevitable was happening, her eyelids disregarded her will and closed like curtains.

While she unknowingly dozed off, something very small tapped on the top of her foot.



Zagreus looked up at the sky.

The twilight sky of the underworld was devoid of both moon and sun. Hundreds of crows swirled above…

When Zagreus pursed his lips and whistled, a mysterious wind began to blow. It tangled his long, black hair as it gusted fiercely. The stronger the wind grew, the more crows gathered to fill the sky.

As he reached out toward the flock, one crow flew into his hand. Zagreus seized the bird without hesitation.

Caw-!

With a scream that sounded like a death cry, the crow was crushed in his grasp.

Aaaah!

A chilling scream rippled from the broken neck, yet the black birds circling around remained, as if it were a natural scene, showing no fear or hesitation.

Black Blood flowed from the crushed bird’s body. The dark liquid trickled down Zagreus’s muscular arm and began to be absorbed into his body. The remains of the dead crow vanished without a trace in an instant.

With his eyes closed, Zagreus took a deep breath and slowly opened his eyelids. He clenched and unclenched the hand that had devoured the crow, smiled faintly, and turned his gaze to the eastern horizon.

“…Found it.”

At last.

Zagreus, smiling joyfully, suddenly swelled up. His back tore open, black feathers sprouted, and soon he had transformed into a gigantic eagle. The eagle soared into the sky of the underworld as if to tear it apart. With each flap of its wings, it covered dozens of kilometers.

The world of the dead unfolded beneath his feet.

A place that was both home and playground, shackle and prison.

Though not acknowledged by his mother due to his sinful birth, Hades cherished him greatly. Having settled in his mother’s womb and been born from her flesh and Blood, even if his birth was deemed impure, Hades accepted Zagreus without hesitation because he was part of his wife.

Hades was that obsessed with his wife. Even though Zagreus was not his own seed, he could love him willingly simply because he was part of Persephone.

The son of the ruler of the brightest place and the heir of the darkest realm. Abandoned yet not abandoned, of noble Blood yet unmentionable by anyone.

Thus, Zagreus’s existence was full of contradictions.

Born with lightning, yet never having left this cold, dark place. Never having been cradled in his mother’s soft embrace.

He did not know warmth. He knew the burning heat that scorched flesh, but not what warmth was. Not until he embraced that human woman.

‘Livia.’

Soon, he would meet her. Though it took a little longer than expected because she was so well hidden, he was confident he could find her. That’s why Zagreus had thrown such bait to Livia.

“When you find my sister, give me a kiss.”

No one in this underworld could escape his eyes. When it came to finding and pursuing, Zagreus surpassed even his father or mother.

“…Alright. But in return, make sure to save my sister.”

For he was the only god of the hunt in this world of death.

Zagreus, vigorously flapping his wings, flew into a mist-covered cliff. The crows had spotted an old man nearby. It was a canyon filled with toxic gas, rumored to be the breath of a Titan.

A suspicious old man wandered through the poisonous mist of the canyon where no one dared to venture.

Zagreus flew into the canyon and stopped in front of a secluded cave. Inside, where stalactites hung like sharp teeth, there was a distinct smell of sorcery.

Here it is.

Unable to contain his excitement, golden lightning flickered in his black eyes. Zagreus stepped through the magical barriers meant to stop him, breaking them as he entered the cave.

Finally, he reached the deepest part of the cave.

“P-please, go back.”

An old man blocked his path.

“Who are you?” Zagreus asked.

The old man bowed his head to the ground and answered in a trembling voice, “I am just a sinner who runs errands.”

“Why is a sinner hiding like a rat in the Misty Canyon?”

“I lost my way…”

“Lying even in hell, it seems you haven’t paid for your sins enough.”



“I will ask again. Who are you, and why are you here?”

“I am…”

Zagreus stood before the hesitant old man.

“Lift your head.”

The old man struggled to lift his head and looked at Zagreus. The golden lightning swirling in his eyes thoroughly scanned the old man’s soul. The old man felt goosebumps all over his body but couldn’t move. The young and beautiful god of death bound him as if chained by fate.

“…Chrysaor.”

As if he finally saw what he wanted, Zagreus murmured the old man’s name from his past life. The old man flinched but tried to gather his composure. The young god, aware of this pathetic attempt, muttered in a mocking voice.

“The fool who dared to challenge the gods riding Pegasus… That was you.”

The wrinkled hand that touched the ground clenched the soil tightly. It was an insulting remark, but not incorrect. As a price for challenging the gods, drunk on dreams of heroism, he had to live as a menial worker in this hell for a full ten thousand years.

Chrysaor regretted it. His past, where he recklessly relied on the golden dagger he had since birth. He should have waited longer.

He should have waited until he had a hundred children from his wife, until those children became warriors worth a hundred each. Then, had he seized control of the sea with them,

Perhaps now, he would not be a menial worker of this hell but a god.

He wanted to become a god.

Not a lowly sinner kneeling and bowing his head, but a god!

“Step aside, sinner.”

“N-no. No…! Please, just let me pass. Just, please!”

Thus, Chrysaor hoped his daughter would seduce the god of the sea. But she failed, and the child almost met a miserable end.

Chrysaor pulled his daughter up from the sewers of hell. He wanted to empower the child who vowed revenge with reddened eyes.

We were sinners because we were weak. Our sin was merely being weaker than the gods! So Echidna, please, bring him down.

If we cannot become gods, then let’s bring down a god…!

“If you don’t move, I will obliterate you.”

…So he resolved.

Zagreus looked at the old man clinging to his feet with annoyance and shook his hand. A dark force grasped the old man’s neck. His trembling fingertips clung to Zagreus’s hem, but the dark force did not leave him alone.

“Ugh, ugh, ack…!”

The hunched old man was consumed by the force. A beast-like roar echoed from the black hole, and then a bright yellow lightning bolt struck, burning the old man. The blackened soul was swallowed whole by the black hole.

It all happened in an instant. While Zagreus brushed off the old man who was in his way and took a few steps forward…

A man who had resisted the gods for a long time and sought to become one vanished without a trace in a moment of futility.

And at that same moment.

“…There you are.”

A smile spread across Zagreus’s face. Without hesitation, he reached out toward the soul hidden in the crevice of the cave.



What woke her from a light sleep was a very small scorpion.

Despite its intimidating appearance with a stinger at the end of its tail, the scorpion tapping Livia’s toes appeared very small and fragile.

“…Is it newly born?”

Livia gazed down at the scorpion that had woken her, her eyes filled with curiosity. Even more intriguing was that the scorpion seemed to be observing her in return.

After a brief moment of mutual examination, the scorpion seemed to lose interest, turned around, and started to walk away. However, one of its pincers got caught in a piece of cloth between the pebbles. It struggled to free itself, but no matter how hard it tried, it couldn’t get loose. Seeing this, Livia gently picked up the scorpion and freed its pincer.

“Be careful. You’re still young, so you shouldn’t come near humans.”

As soon as she placed the scorpion back down, it curled its tail and tapped her toes again.

Curious about its intentions, she watched as it tapped her toes, walked a short distance away, then turned back to wait for her. It was as if this clever little creature was beckoning her to follow.

‘No way, could it be?’

Thinking it couldn’t possibly be signaling her, she continued to watch. But when the scorpion returned and pinched her foot, she exclaimed, “Ouch!”

Startled, Livia saw the scorpion waving its pincers as if urging her to follow. Could a mere scorpion communicate with a human? She was puzzled, but then again, this wasn’t a situation where normal logic applied.

She glanced in the direction the scorpion wanted her to go. It led into the dark depths of the cave. She had never feared the dark, but perhaps due to the recent trials she had faced, she hesitated. Then, after another sharp pinch from the scorpion, Livia finally moved her feet.

Fine, let’s see where this goes.

Meeting a strange scorpion like this might have been some sort of sign. Whether it was a good sign or a bad one, she didn’t know….

The scorpion scurried ahead energetically, and the cave was larger than she had anticipated, requiring her to venture quite far inside. Fortunately, a faint light emanated from deeper within, so it wasn’t completely dark.

Moreover, with the small creature returning to pinch her foot whenever she hesitated, she didn’t feel alone.

As Livia moved toward the gradually brightening path, she suddenly stopped, eyes wide with surprise.

Deep within the cave, she arrived at a small spring surrounded by a cluster of tiny plants. A slanted hole in the ceiling let in a dim light that illuminated the once-dark cave. Around the spring, lush green plants thrived, creating a rather plausible ecosystem. At the very end of the cave, part of the wall had crumbled, connecting to the outside. It was the perfect hidden place to live.

Livia hesitated, then approached the spring and cautiously examined the water. It was so clear and transparent that it didn’t seem like a pool found in the desert. She dipped her hand in, finding it surprisingly cold.

‘Is it groundwater?’

After sniffing it briefly, Livia carefully scooped some water and sipped it. The water was cool and sweet. Once she was sure it wouldn’t make her sick, she drank greedily. Though she thought she could bear her thirst, once the water touched her lips, she realized how parched she had been. As the water quenched her dry body, she felt revitalized.

After drinking deeply, Livia plopped down on the spot. The presence of water brought with it a lively soundscape. Insects flitted through the grass, the wind whispered, and the footsteps of the scorpion that had led her here could be heard.

Come to think of it, did the scorpion lead her here to show her the water?

It was quite a generous gesture in return for freeing its pincer. Livia looked down at the scorpion, which had come close to her again. She tapped its back gently in thanks, and the startled scorpion stung her lightly with its sharp tail before scurrying away.

Livia chuckled softly.

Life continued in the cave after that. Livia wandered aimlessly outside, searching for something indescribable but always came up empty.

There was nothing. Nothing at all. She was truly trapped in a desert of sand.




Continue in part 3
